#ThisURL#
http://goodmovieslist.com/best-movies/best-250-movies.html
#SubURL#
http://goodmovieslist.com/best-movies/best-action-movies.html
http://goodmovieslist.com/best-movies/best-movies-of-1940-1949.html
http://goodmovieslist.com/best-movies/best-movies-of-2008.html
http://goodmovieslist.com/best-movies/best-movies-of-1950-1959.html
http://goodmovieslist.com/best-movies/best-movies-of-2000-2009.html
http://goodmovieslist.com
http://goodmovieslist.com/best-movies/best-movies-of-1960-1969.html
http://goodmovieslist.com/best-movies/best-movies-of-2011.html
http://goodmovieslist.com/best-movies/best-movies-of-2010-2019.html
http://goodmovieslist.com/best-movies/best-movies-of-1970-1979.html
#Title#
Best 250 Movies to Watch - Good Movies List
#Content#
Good Movies List Best 250 Movies Best 250 movies Oscar winners Palme d'Or winners Best TV mini-series New movies in theaters Best movies of 2015 Best movies of 2014 Best movies of 2013 Best movies of 2012 Best movies of 2011 Best movies of 2010 Best movies of 2009 Best movies of 2008 Action movies Adventure movies Animation movies Biography movies Comedy movies Crime movies Disney movies Documentary movies Drama movies Erotic movies Family movies Fantasy movies Film-Noir movies History movies Horror movies Independent movies Music movies Musical movies Mystery movies Romance movies Sci-Fi movies Short movies Sport movies Thriller movies War movies Western movies 2010-2016 movies 2000-2009 movies 1990-1999 movies 1980-1989 movies 1970-1979 movies 1960-1969 movies 1950-1959 movies 1940-1949 movies 1930-1939 movies 1920-1929 movies Good Movies List homepage Movie quotes About this site Privacy policy Mark this movie as seen or wanted #1 The Shawshank Redemption 1994 Fear can hold you prisoner. Hope can set you free. Director: Frank Darabont. Cast: Tim Robbins, Morgan Freeman, Bob Gunton, William Sadler, Clancy Brown, Gil Bellows, Mark Rolston, James Whitmore, Renee Blaine, Brian Delate, Brian Libby. Overview: Framed in the 1940s for the double murder of his wife and her lover, upstanding banker Andy Dufresne begins a new life at the Shawshank prison, where he puts his accounting skills to work for an amoral warden. During his long stretch in prison, Dufresne comes to be admired by the other inmates -- including an older prisoner named Red -- for his integrity and unquenchable sense of hope. Genres: Drama, Crime. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 22m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #2 The Godfather 1972 An offer you can't refuse. Director: Francis Ford Coppola. Cast: Marlon Brando, Al Pacino, James Caan, Richard S. Castellano, Robert Duvall, Sterling Hayden, John Marley, Richard Conte, Al Lettieri, Diane Keaton, Abe Vigoda, Talia Shire, Gianni Russo, John Cazale, Rudy Bond. Overview: The story spans the years from 1945 to 1955 and chronicles the fictional Italian-American Corleone crime family. When organized crime family patriarch Vito Corleone barely survives an attempt on his life, his youngest son, Michael, steps in to take care of the would-be killers, launching a campaign of bloody revenge. Genres: Drama, Crime. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 55m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #3 The Godfather: Part II 1974 I don't feel I have to wipe everybody out, Tom. Just my enemies. Director: Francis Ford Coppola. Cast: Al Pacino, Robert Duvall, Diane Keaton, Robert De Niro, John Cazale, Talia Shire, Lee Strasberg, Michael V. Gazzo, G.D. Spradlin, Richard Bright, Francesca De Sapio, Oreste Baldini, Gastone Moschin, Giuseppe Sillato, Kelly Williams. Overview: The continuing saga of the Corleone crime family tells the story of a young Vito Corleone growing up in Sicily and in 1910s New York; and follows Michael Corleone in the 1950s as he attempts to expand the family business into Las Vegas, Hollywood and Cuba Genres: Action, Crime, Drama, Thriller. Countries: Dominican Republic, Italy, United States of America. Runtime: 3h 20m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #4 The Dark Knight 2008 Why So Serious? Director: Christopher Nolan. Cast: Christian Bale, Heath Ledger, Maggie Gyllenhaal, Aaron Eckhart, Morgan Freeman, Gary Oldman, Michael Caine, Eric Roberts, Michael Jai White, James Smith, Monique Gabriela Curnen, Ron Dean, Cillian Murphy, Chin Han, Ritchie Coster. Overview: Batman raises the stakes in his war on crime. With the help of Lt. Jim Gordon and District Attorney Harvey Dent, Batman sets out to dismantle the remaining criminal organizations that plague the streets. The partnership proves to be effective, but they soon find themselves prey to a reign of chaos unleashed by a rising criminal mastermind known to the terrified citizens of Gotham as the Joker. Genres: Action, Adventure, Crime, Fantasy, Science Fiction, Thriller. Countries: United Kingdom, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 32m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #5 12 Angry Men 1957 Life is in their hands. Death is on their minds Director: Sidney Lumet. Cast: Martin Balsam, John Fiedler, Lee J. Cobb, E.G. Marshall, Jack Klugman, Edward Binns, Jack Warden, Henry Fonda, Joseph Sweeney, Ed Begley, George Voskovec, Robert Webber, Rudy Bond, James Kelly, Billy Nelson. Overview: 12 Angry Men is the 1957 film debut for director Sidney Lumet. An interpretion from a Broadway show, this film is about 12 jurors who must decide whether an 18-year-old is guilty of killing his father. Genres: Drama, Mystery. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 36m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #6 Schindler's List 1993 Whoever saves one life, saves the world entire. Director: Steven Spielberg. Cast: Liam Neeson, Ben Kingsley, Ralph Fiennes, Caroline Goodall, Jonathan Sagall, Embeth Davidtz, Malgoscha Gebel, Shmuel Levy, Mark Ivanir, Béatrice Macola, Andrzej Seweryn, Friedrich von Thun, Krzysztof Luft, Harry Nehring, Norbert Weisser. Overview: Told from the perspective of businessman Oskar Schindler who saved over a thousand Jewish lives from the Nazis while they worked as slaves in his factory. Schindler’s List is based on a true story, illustrated in black and white and controversially filmed in many original locations. Genres: Drama, History, War. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 3h 15m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #7 Pulp Fiction 1994 Just because you are a character doesn't mean you have character. Director: Quentin Tarantino. Cast: John Travolta, Samuel L. Jackson, Uma Thurman, Bruce Willis, Maria de Medeiros, Ving Rhames, Harvey Keitel, Eric Stoltz, Tim Roth, Amanda Plummer, Peter Greene, Rosanna Arquette, Duane Whitaker, Paul Calderon, Frank Whaley. Overview: Pulp Fiction is a cult film by Director Quentin Tarantino with three interwoven plots with lots of violence, absurdity, and great music. The film is Tarantino’s most famous and the film that cemented his name and style in Hollywood. Genres: Crime, Drama, Indie, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 28m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #8 The Good, the Bad and the Ugly 1967 Il buono, il brutto, il cattivo For three men the Civil War wasn’t hell. It was practice. Director: Sergio Leone. Cast: Eli Wallach, Clint Eastwood, Lee Van Cleef, Aldo Giuffrè, Luigi Pistilli, Rada Rassimov, John Bartha, Livio Lorenzon, Antonio Casale, Angelo Novi, José Terrón. Overview: A bounty hunting scam joins two men in an uneasy alliance against a third in a race to find a fortune in gold buried in a remote cemetery.This is the third Italian-Western film of a trilogy from director Sergio Leone who gives Western films a new (bloody) color. Genres: Action, Adventure, Drama, Western. Countries: Italy, Spain, Germany. Runtime: 2h 41m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #9 The Lord of the Rings: The Return of the King 2003 The eye of the enemy is moving. Director: Peter Jackson. Cast: Elijah Wood, Ian McKellen, Viggo Mortensen, Liv Tyler, Orlando Bloom, John Rhys-Davies, Sean Astin, Billy Boyd, Dominic Monaghan, Hugo Weaving, Bernard Hill, Andy Serkis, Miranda Otto, David Wenham, Karl Urban. Overview: Aragorn is revealed as the heir to the ancient kings as he, Gandalf and the other members of the broken fellowship struggle to save Gondor from Sauron's forces. Meanwhile, Frodo and Sam bring the ring closer to the heart of Mordor, the dark lord's realm. Genres: Action, Adventure, Drama, Fantasy, Science Fiction. Countries: New Zealand, United States of America. Runtime: 3h 21m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #10 Fight Club 1999 How much can you know about yourself if you've never been in a fight? Director: David Fincher. Cast: Edward Norton, Brad Pitt, Helena Bonham Carter, Meat Loaf, Zach Grenier, Richmond Arquette, David Andrews, Rachel Singer, Holt McCallany, Eion Bailey, Jared Leto, Peter Iacangelo. Overview: A ticking-time-bomb insomniac and a slippery soap salesman channel primal male aggression into a shocking new form of therapy. Their concept catches on, with underground "fight clubs" forming in every town, until an eccentric gets in the way and ignites an out-of-control spiral toward oblivion. Genres: Action, Comedy, Crime, Drama, Thriller. Countries: Germany, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 18m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #11 The Lord of the Rings: The Fellowship of the Ring 2001 One ring to rule them all Director: Peter Jackson. Cast: Elijah Wood, Ian McKellen, Viggo Mortensen, Liv Tyler, Orlando Bloom, John Rhys-Davies, Sean Bean, Christopher Lee, Sean Astin, Billy Boyd, Dominic Monaghan, Hugo Weaving, Cate Blanchett, Ian Holm, Craig Parker. Overview: Young hobbit Frodo Baggins, after inheriting a mysterious ring from his uncle Bilbo, must leave his home in order to keep it from falling into the hands of its evil creator. Along the way, a fellowship is formed to protect the ringbearer and make sure that the ring arrives at its final destination: Mt. Doom, the only place where it can be destroyed. Genres: Action, Adventure, Drama, Fantasy, Science Fiction. Countries: New Zealand, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 58m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #12 Star Wars: Episode V - The Empire Strikes Back 1980 The Adventure Continues... Director: Irvin Kershner. Cast: Mark Hamill, Harrison Ford, Carrie Fisher, David Prowse, Billy Dee Williams, Anthony Daniels, Peter Mayhew, James Earl Jones, Kenny Baker, Frank Oz, Alec Guinness, Jeremy Bulloch, John Hollis, Jack Purvis, Des Webb. Overview: The epic saga continues as Luke Skywalker, in hopes of defeating the evil Galactic Empire, learns the ways of the Jedi from aging master Yoda. But Darth Vader is more determined than ever to capture Luke. Meanwhile, rebel leader Princess Leia, cocky Han Solo, Chewbacca, and droids C-3PO and R2-D2 are thrown into various stages of capture, betrayal and despair. Genres: Action, Family, Fantasy, Science Fiction, Adventure. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 4m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #13 Forrest Gump 1994 Life is like a box of chocolates...you never know what you're gonna get. Director: Robert Zemeckis. Cast: Tom Hanks, Robin Wright, Gary Sinise, Mykelti Williamson, Sally Field, Michael Conner Humphreys, Peter Dobson, Hanna R. Hall, Sonny Shroyer, Jed Gillin, Afemo Omilami, Steven Griffith, John William Galt, Nora Dunfee, Michael Mattison. Overview: A man with a low IQ has accomplished great things in his life and been present during significant historic events - in each case, far exceeding what anyone imagined he could do. Yet, despite all the things he has attained, his one true love eludes him. "Forrest Gump" is the story of a man who rose above his challenges, and who proved that determination, courage, and love are more important than ability. Genres: Comedy, Drama, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 22m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #14 Inception 2010 Your mind is the scene of the crime. Director: Christopher Nolan. Cast: Leonardo DiCaprio, Joseph Gordon-Levitt, Ellen Page, Marion Cotillard, Ken Watanabe, Michael Caine, Tom Hardy, Cillian Murphy, Tom Berenger, Lukas Haas, Dileep Rao. Overview: Dom Cobb is a skilled thief, the absolute best in the dangerous art of extraction, stealing valuable secrets from deep within the subconscious during the dream state, when the mind is at its most vulnerable. Cobb's rare ability has made him a coveted player in this treacherous new world of corporate espionage, but it has also made him an international fugitive and cost him everything he has ever loved. Now Cobb is being offered a chance at redemption. One last job could give him his life back but only if he can accomplish the impossible - inception. Instead of the perfect heist, Cobb and his team of specialists have to pull off the reverse: their task is not to steal an idea but to plant one. If they succeed, it could be the perfect crime. But no amount of careful planning or expertise can prepare the team for the dangerous enemy that seems to predict their every move. An enemy that only Cobb could have seen coming. Genres: Action, Adventure, Science Fiction, Thriller. Countries: United Kingdom, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 28m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #15 One Flew Over The Cuckoo's Nest 1975 If he's crazy, what does that make you? Director: Milos Forman. Cast: Jack Nicholson, Louise Fletcher, William Redfield, Michael Berryman, Peter Brocco, Dean R. Brooks, Alonzo Brown, Scatman Crothers, Mwako Cumbuka, Danny DeVito, William Duell, Josip Elic, Lan Fendors, Nathan George, Ken Kenny. Overview: While serving time for insanity at a state mental hospital, implacable rabble-rouser Randle Patrick McMurphy inspires his fellow patients to rebel against the authoritarian rule of head nurse Mildred Ratched. Genre: Drama. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 13m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #16 The Lord of the Rings: The Two Towers 2002 A New Power Is Rising. Director: Peter Jackson. Cast: Elijah Wood, Ian McKellen, Viggo Mortensen, Liv Tyler, Orlando Bloom, John Rhys-Davies, Christopher Lee, Sean Astin, Billy Boyd, Dominic Monaghan, Hugo Weaving, Craig Parker, Bernard Hill, Andy Serkis, Brad Dourif. Overview: Frodo and Sam are trekking to Mordor to destroy the One Ring of Power while Gimli, Legolas and Aragorn search for the orc-captured Merry and Pippin. All along, nefarious wizard Saruman awaits the Fellowship members at the Orthanc Tower in Isengard. Genres: Action, Adventure, Fantasy. Countries: New Zealand, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 59m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #17 Goodfellas 1990 Three Decades of Life in the Mafia. Director: Martin Scorsese. Cast: Robert De Niro, Ray Liotta, Joe Pesci, Lorraine Bracco, Paul Sorvino, Chuck Low, Frank Sivero, Frank DiLeo, Tony Darrow, Mike Starr, Frank Vincent, Frank Adonis, Catherine Scorsese, Suzanne Shepherd, Gina Mastrogiacomo. Overview: Henry Hill is a small time gangster, who takes part in a robbery with Jimmy Conway and Tommy De Vito, two other gangsters who have set their sights a bit higher. His two partners kill off everyone else involved in the robbery, and slowly start to climb up through the hierarchy of the Mob. Henry, however, is badly affected by his partners success, but will he stoop low enough to bring about the downfall of Jimmy and Tommy? Genres: Crime, Drama. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 25m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #18 The Matrix 1999 Welcome to the Real World. Directors: Lana Wachowski, Andy Wachowski. Cast: Keanu Reeves, Carrie-Anne Moss, Laurence Fishburne, Hugo Weaving, Marcus Chong, Gloria Foster, Julian Arahanga, Belinda McClory, Joe Pantoliano, Matt Doran, Anthony Ray Parker, Paul Goddard, David Aston, Marc Aden. Overview: A computer hacker learns from mysterious rebels about the true nature of his reality and his role in the war against its controllers. Genres: Action, Adventure, Science Fiction, Thriller. Countries: Australia, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 16m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #19 Star Wars: Episode IV: A New Hope 1977 A long time ago in a galaxy far, far away... Director: George Lucas. Cast: Mark Hamill, Carrie Fisher, Harrison Ford, Peter Cushing, Anthony Daniels, Kenny Baker, Alec Guinness, Peter Mayhew, David Prowse, James Earl Jones, Phil Brown, Shelagh Fraser, Roger Lloyd-Pack. Overview: Princess Leia is captured and held hostage by the evil Imperial forces in their effort to take over the galactic Empire. Venturesome Luke Skywalker and dashing captain Han Solo team together with the loveable robot duo R2-D2 and C-3PO to rescue the beautiful princess and restore peace and justice in the Empire. Genres: Action, Family, Fantasy, Science Fiction. Countries: Tunisia, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 1m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #20 Seven Samurai 1954 Shichinin no samurai Director: Akira Kurosawa. Cast: Toshirô Mifune, Takashi Shimura, Yoshio Inaba, Seiji Miyaguchi, Minoru Chiaki, Daisuke Katô, Isao Kimura, Keiko Tsushima. Overview: A veteran samurai, who has fallen on hard times, answers a village's request for protection from bandits. He gathers 6 other samurai to help him, and they teach the townspeople how to defend themselves, and they supply the samurai with three small meals a day. The film culminates in a giant battle when 40 bandits attack the village. Genres: Action, Drama, Foreign, Indie. Country: Japan. Runtime: 3h 27m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #21 City of God 2002 Cidade de Deus If you run you're dead...if you stay, you're dead again. Period. Directors: Fernando Meirelles, Kátia Lund, Lamartine Ferreira, Isabella Teixeira, Malu Miranda. Cast: Alexandre Rodrigues, Leandro Firmino, Phellipe Haagensen, Douglas Silva, Jonathan Haagensen, Matheus Nachtergaele, Seu Jorge, Jefechander Suplino, Alice Braga, Roberta Rodrigues, Luis Otávio, Darlan Cunha. Overview: City of God is one of the most successful Brazilian films of all times. It depicts the raw violence in the ghettos of Rio de Janeiro in the 1970’s that even had young kids carrying guns and joining gangs when they should be playing hide-and-seek. Genres: Crime, Drama, Foreign. Country: Brazil. Runtime: 2h 10m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #22 Se7en 1995 Seven Seven deadly sins. Seven ways to die. Director: David Fincher. Cast: Brad Pitt, Morgan Freeman, Gwyneth Paltrow, R. Lee Ermey, Andrew Kevin Walker, Kevin Spacey, Daniel Zacapa, John Cassini, Hawthorne James, Richard Roundtree, John C. McGinley. Overview: Two homicide detectives are on a desperate hunt for a serial killer whose crimes are based on the "seven deadly sins" in this dark and haunting film that takes viewers from the tortured remains of one victim to the next. The seasoned Det. Sommerset researches each sin in an effort to get inside the killer's mind, while his novice partner, Mills, scoffs at his efforts to unravel the case. Genres: Crime, Horror, Mystery, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 7m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #23 The Silence of the Lambs 1991 To enter the mind of a killer she must challenge the mind of a madman. Director: Jonathan Demme. Cast: Jodie Foster, Anthony Hopkins, Anthony Heald, Scott Glenn, Ted Levine, Frankie Faison, Kasi Lemmons, Brooke Smith, Don Brockett, Chuck Aber, Tracey Walter, Obba Babatundé, Diane Baker, Roger Corman, Charles Napier. Overview: FBI trainee Clarice Starling ventures into a maximum-security asylum to pick the diseased brain of Hannibal Lecter, a psychiatrist turned homicidal cannibal. Starling needs clues to help her capture a serial killer. Unfortunately, her Faustian relationship with Lecter soon leads to his escape, and now two deranged killers are on the loose. Genres: Crime, Drama, Suspense, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 58m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #24 The Usual Suspects 1995 Five Criminals . One Line Up . No Coincidence. Director: Bryan Singer. Cast: Kevin Spacey, Stephen Baldwin, Gabriel Byrne, Benicio Del Toro, Kevin Pollak, Chazz Palminteri, Pete Postlethwaite, Giancarlo Esposito, Suzy Amis, Dan Hedaya, Christine Estabrook, Clark Gregg, Louis Lombardi, Paul Bartel, Peter Greene. Overview: A boat has been destroyed, criminals are dead, and the key to this mystery lies with the only survivor and his twisted, convoluted story beginning with five career crooks in a seemingly random police lineup. Genres: Crime, Mystery, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 46m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #25 It's a Wonderful Life 1946 It's a wonderful laugh! It's a wonderful love! Director: Frank Capra. Cast: James Stewart, Donna Reed, Lionel Barrymore, Thomas Mitchell, Henry Travers, Beulah Bondi, Frank Faylen, Todd Karns, Samuel S. Hinds, Georgie Nokes, Ward Bond, Gloria Grahame, H.B. Warner, Frank Albertson. Overview: An angel helps a compassionate but despairingly frustrated businessman by showing what life would had been like if he never existed. Genres: Drama, Fantasy, Holiday. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 10m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #26 Life Is Beautiful 1997 La vita è bella An unforgettable fable that proves love, family and imagination conquer all. Director: Roberto Benigni. Cast: Nicoletta Braschi, Roberto Benigni, Giorgio Cantarini, Giustino Durano, Amerigo Fontani, Sergio Bini Bustric, Lidia Alfonsi, Horst Buchholz, Pietro De Silva, Marisa Paredes, Giuliana Lojodice, Francesco Guzzo, Adelaide Alaïs, Verena Buratti, Hannes Hellmann. Overview: A touching story of an Italian book seller of Jewish ancestry who lives in his own little fairy tale. His creative and happy life would come to an abrupt halt when his entire family is deported to a concentration camp during World War II. While locked up he tries to convince his son that the whole thing is just a game. Genres: Comedy, Drama. Country: Italy. Runtime: 1h 56m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #27 Leon: The Professional 1994 Léon If you want a job done well, hire a professional. Director: Luc Besson. Cast: Jean Reno, Natalie Portman, Gary Oldman, Danny Aiello, Peter Appel, Willi One Blood, Don Creech, Keith A. Glascoe, Michael Badalucco. Overview: Léon, the top hit man in New York, has earned a rep as an effective "cleaner." But when his next-door neighbors are wiped out by a loose-cannon DEA agent, he becomes the unwilling custodian of 12-year-old Mathilda. Before long, Mathilda's thoughts turn to revenge, and she considers following in Léon's footsteps. Genres: Crime, Thriller. Countries: France, United States of America. Runtime: 1h 50m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #28 Once Upon a Time in the West 1969 C'era una volta il West There were three men in her life. One to take her... one to love her... and one to kill her. Director: Sergio Leone. Cast: Henry Fonda, Claudia Cardinale, Jason Robards, Charles Bronson, Gabriele Ferzetti, Paolo Stoppa, Woody Strode, Jack Elam, Keenan Wynn, Frank Wolff, Lionel Stander. Overview: Once Upon a Time in the West is the first and most ambitious film from a trilogy by Sergio Leones. This classic western masterpiece is an epic film about a widow who’s land and life are in danger as the railroad is getting closer and closer to taking them over. A mysterious harmonica player joins forces with Desperado to protect the woman and her land. Brilliant performances and a daring cinematic Genres: Action, Foreign, Western. Countries: Italy, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 45m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #29 Interstellar 2014 Mankind was born on Earth. It was never meant to die here. Director: Christopher Nolan. Cast: Matthew McConaughey, Anne Hathaway, Jessica Chastain, Michael Caine, Casey Affleck, Ellen Burstyn, Matt Damon, John Lithgow, Timothee Chalamet, Mackenzie Foy, Wes Bentley, Bill Irwin, Topher Grace, David Oyelowo, David Gyasi. Overview: Interstellar chronicles the adventures of a group of explorers who make use of a newly discovered wormhole to surpass the limitations on human space travel and conquer the vast distances involved in an interstellar voyage. Genres: Drama, Science Fiction. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 49m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #30 Saving Private Ryan 1998 In the Last Great Invasion of the Last Great War, The Greatest Danger for Eight Men was Saving... One. Director: Steven Spielberg. Cast: Tom Hanks, Tom Sizemore, Dennis Farina, Joerg Stadler, Harve Presnell, Max Martini, Matt Damon, Edward Burns, Barry Pepper, Vin Diesel, Adam Goldberg, Giovanni Ribisi, Jeremy Davies, Ted Danson, Paul Giamatti. Overview: As U.S. troops storm the beaches of Normandy, three brothers lie dead on the battlefield, with a fourth trapped behind enemy lines. Ranger captain John Miller and seven men are tasked with penetrating German-held territory and bringing the boy home. Genres: Action, Drama, History, War. Countries: France, United Kingdom, Ireland. Runtime: 2h 50m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #31 American History X 1998 Some Legacies Must End. Director: Tony Kaye. Cast: Edward Norton, Edward Furlong, Beverly D'Angelo, Avery Brooks, Jennifer Lien, Ethan Suplee, Stacy Keach, Fairuza Balk, Elliott Gould, Guy Torry, William Russ, Joe Cortese, Jason Bose Smith, Antonio David Lyons, Alex Sol. Overview: Derek Vineyard is paroled after serving 3 years in prison for killing two thugs who tried to break into/steal his truck. Through his brother, Danny Vineyard's narration, we learn that before going to prison, Derek was a skinhead and the leader of a violent white supremacist gang that committed acts of racial crime throughout L.A. and his actions greatly influenced Danny. Reformed and fresh out of prison, Derek severs contact with the gang and becomes determined to keep Danny from going down the same violent path as he did. Genre: Drama. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 59m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #32 Spirited Away 2001 Sen to Chihiro no kamikakushi The tunnel led Chihiro to a mysterious town... Director: Hayao Miyazaki. Cast: Rumi Hîragi, Miyu Irino, Mari Natsuki, Takashi Naitô, Yasuko Sawaguchi, Tatsuya Gashuin, Ryunosuke Kamiki, Yumi Tamai. Overview: Spirited Away is an Oscar winning Japanese animated film about a ten year old girl who wanders away from her parents along a path that leads to a world ruled by strange and unusual monster-like animals. Her parents have been changed into pigs along with others inside a bathhouse full of these creatures. Will she ever see the world how it once was? Genres: Animation, Family, Fantasy. Country: Japan. Runtime: 2h 5m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #33 Casablanca 1942 They had a date with fate in Casablanca! Director: Michael Curtiz. Cast: Humphrey Bogart, Ingrid Bergman, Paul Henreid, Claude Rains, Conrad Veidt, Sydney Greenstreet, Peter Lorre, Madeleine Lebeau, Dooley Wilson, Joy Page, John Qualen, Leonid Kinskey, Curt Bois, Marcel Dalio, Helmut Dantine. Overview: Casablanca is a classic and one of the most revered films of all time. Starring Humphrey Bogart and Ingrid Bergman in a love triangle in the city of Casablanca which is a refuge for many fleeing foreigners looking for a new life during the war. Political romance with a backdrop of war conflict between democracy and totalitarianism. A landmark in film history. Genres: Crime, Drama, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 42m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #34 Indiana Jones and the Raiders of the Lost Ark 1981 Raiders of the Lost Ark Indiana Jones - the new hero from the creators of JAWS and STAR WARS. Director: Steven Spielberg. Cast: Harrison Ford, Karen Allen, Paul Freeman, Ronald Lacey, John Rhys-Davies, Denholm Elliott, Wolf Kahler, Anthony Higgins, Vic Tablian, Don Fellows, William Hootkins, Alfred Molina, Kelly Williams. Overview: When Dr. Indiana Jones -- the tweed-suited professor who just happens to be a celebrated archaeologist -- is hired by the government to locate the legendary Ark of the Covenant, he finds himself up against the entire Nazi regime. Genres: Action, Adventure. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 55m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #35 Psycho 1960 Check in. Relax. Take a shower. Directors: Alfred Hitchcock, Hilton A. Green. Cast: Anthony Perkins, Vera Miles, John Gavin, Janet Leigh, Martin Balsam, John McIntire, Simon Oakland, Frank Albertson, Patricia Hitchcock, Vaughn Taylor, Lurene Tuttle, Mort Mills, John Anderson. Overview: Psycho is one of the most famous masterpieces from Hitchcock and for it’s time was unparalleled in it’s horror effect. A chilling score sets the pace for an introverted killer and a mystery thriller case of multiple dimensions. The credits for the film directed by Saul Bass were revolutionary for their time. Genres: Drama, Horror, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 46m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #36 City Lights 1931 Director: Charlie Chaplin. Cast: Charlie Chaplin, Virginia Cherrill, Florence Lee, Harry Myers, Al Ernest Garcia, Hank Mann. Overview: City Lights is the first silent film that Charlie Chaplin directed after he established himself with sound accompanied films. The film is about a penniless man who falls in love with a flower girl. The film was a great success and today is deemed a cult classic. Genres: Comedy, Drama, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 27m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #37 Rear Window 1954 Directors: Alfred Hitchcock, Herbert Coleman. Cast: Grace Kelly, James Stewart, Wendell Corey, Thelma Ritter, Raymond Burr, Judith Evelyn, Ross Bagdasarian, Georgine Darcy, Sara Berner, Frank Cady, Jesslyn Fax, Rand Harper, Irene Winston, Havis Davenport. Overview: Jefferies has had his leg in a cast for weeks and has nothing to do but watch his neighbors from his window. His voyeurism leads him to think that he’s witnessed a murder. Together with his girlfriend Lisa and his nurse Stella they try to solve the mystery and possibly a murder. Genres: Suspense, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 52m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #38 Intouchables 2012 A masseuse's journey to find the human touch. Directors: Eric Toledano, Olivier Nakache. Cast: François Cluzet, Omar Sy, Anne Le Ny, Audrey Fleurot, Clotilde Mollet, Alba Gaïa Kraghede Bellugi, Cyril Mendy, Christian Ameri, Salimata Kamate, Marie-Laure Descoureaux. Overview: A true story of two men who should never have met - a quadriplegic aristocrat who was injured in a paragliding accident and a young man from the projects. Genres: Drama, Comedy, Foreign. Country: France. Runtime: 1h 52m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #39 Modern Times 1936 Director: Charlie Chaplin. Cast: Charlie Chaplin, Paulette Goddard, Henry Bergman, Tiny Sandford, Chester Conklin, Hank Mann, Stanley Blystone, Al Ernest Garcia, Richard Alexander, Cecil Reynolds, Mira McKinney, Murdock MacQuarrie, Wilfred Lucas, Edward LeSaint, Fred Malatesta. Overview: The Tramp struggles to live in modern industrial society with the help of a young homeless woman. Genres: Comedy, Science Fiction. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 27m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #40 Terminator 2: Judgment Day 1991 It's nothing personal. Director: James Cameron. Cast: Arnold Schwarzenegger, Linda Hamilton, Edward Furlong, Robert Patrick, Earl Boen, Joe Morton, S. Epatha Merkerson, Castulo Guerra, Danny Cooksey, Jenette Goldstein, Xander Berkeley. Overview: Nearly 10 years have passed since Sarah Connor was targeted for termination by a cyborg from the future. Now her son, John, the future leader of the resistance, is the target for a newer, more deadly terminator. Once again, the resistance has managed to send a protector back to attempt to save John and his mother Sarah. Genres: Action, Science Fiction, Thriller. Countries: France, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 17m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #41 Whiplash 2014 The road to greatness can take you to the edge. Director: Damien Chazelle. Cast: Miles Teller, J.K. Simmons, Melissa Benoist, Austin Stowell, Jayson Blair, Kavita Patil, Paul Reiser. Overview: Under the direction of a ruthless instructor, a talented young drummer begins to pursue perfection at any cost, even his humanity. Genres: Drama, Music. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 45m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #42 The Green Mile 1999 Miracles do happen. Director: Frank Darabont. Cast: Tom Hanks, Michael Clarke Duncan, Bonnie Hunt, David Morse, Michael Jeter, Graham Greene, Patricia Clarkson, Dabbs Greer, Gary Sinise, Doug Hutchison, Sam Rockwell, James Cromwell, Barry Pepper. Overview: A supernatural tale set on death row in a Southern prison, where gentle giant John Coffey possesses the mysterious power to heal people's ailments. When the cellblock's head guard, Paul Edgecomb, recognizes Coffey's miraculous gift, he tries desperately to help stave off the condemned man's execution. Genres: Crime, Drama, Fantasy, Science Fiction. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 3h 8m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #43 The Pianist 2002 Director: Roman Polanski. Cast: Adrien Brody, Thomas Kretschmann, Frank Finlay, Maureen Lipman, Emilia Fox, Ed Stoppard, Julia Rayner, Jessica Kate Meyer, Michał Żebrowski, Wanja Mues, Richard Ridings, Nomi Sharron, Detlev von Wangenheim, Krzysztof Pieczynski. Overview: The Pianist is a film adapted from the biography of Wladyslaw Szpilman. A Jewish-Polish pianist who during the second world war lived and hid miraculously in Warsaw after having gone through a terrible tragedy. A film from Roman Polanski. Genres: Drama, Foreign, History. Countries: Germany, France, United Kingdom, Poland. Runtime: 2h 30m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #44 Memento 2001 Some memories are best forgotten. Director: Christopher Nolan. Cast: Guy Pearce, Carrie-Anne Moss, Joe Pantoliano, Mark Boone Junior, Russ Fega, Jorja Fox, Stephen Tobolowsky, Harriet Sansom Harris, Thomas Lennon, Callum Keith Rennie, Kimberly Campbell, Marianne Muellerleile, Larry Holden, Buzz Visconti. Overview: Suffering short-term memory loss after a head injury, Leonard Shelby embarks on a grim quest to find the lowlife who murdered his wife in this gritty, complex thriller that packs more knots than a hangman's noose. To carry out his plan, Shelby snaps Polaroids of people and places, jotting down contextual notes on the backs of photos to aid in his search and jog his memory. He even tattoos his own body in a desperate bid to remember. Genres: Crime, Drama, Suspense, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 53m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #45 The Departed 2006 Lies. Betrayal. Sacrifice. How far will you take it? Director: Martin Scorsese. Cast: Leonardo DiCaprio, Jack Nicholson, Mark Wahlberg, Matt Damon, Dick Hughes, Ray Winstone, Anthony Anderson, Alec Baldwin, David O'Hara, Vera Farmiga, Kevin Corrigan, James Badge Dale, Robert Wahlberg, Kristen Dalton, Thomas B. Duffy. Overview: To take down South Boston's Irish Mafia, the police send in one of their own to infiltrate the underworld, not realizing the syndicate has done likewise in Martin Scorsese's multiple Oscar-winning crime thriller. While an undercover cop curries favor with the mob kingpin, a career criminal rises through the police ranks. But both sides soon discover there's a mole among them. Genres: Drama, Action, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 31m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #46 Gladiator 2000 Father of a murdered son, husband to a murdered wife and I shall have my vengeance in this life or the next Director: Ridley Scott. Cast: Russell Crowe, Joaquin Phoenix, Connie Nielsen, Oliver Reed, Richard Harris, Derek Jacobi, Djimon Hounsou, David Schofield, John Shrapnel, Tomas Arana, Ralf Moeller, Tommy Flanagan, Spencer Treat Clark, David Hemmings, Sven-Ole Thorsen. Overview: Gladiator is an epic film of love, death and betrayal set in the Roman Empire. General Maximus' success in battle earns the favour of an elderly Emperor at the expense of the Emperor's son. In a fit of jealous rage the son slays his father before turning his anger towards Maximus. Now reduced to a slave, his family dead, Maximus must fight as a Gladiator to gain his freedom, and his revenge. Genres: Action, Drama, History, Adventure. Countries: United Kingdom, Morocco, Malta, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 35m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #47 Apocalypse Now 1979 This is the end... Director: Francis Ford Coppola. Cast: Martin Sheen, Marlon Brando, Robert Duvall, Laurence Fishburne, Sam Bottoms, Frederic Forrest, Albert Hall, Harrison Ford, Dennis Hopper, G. D. Spradlin, Jerry Ziesmer, Francis Ford Coppola, Tom Mason, Scott Glenn, Colleen Camp. Overview: At the height of the Vietnam war, Captain Benjamin Willard is sent on a dangerous mission that, officially, "does not exist, nor will it ever exist." His goal is to locate - and eliminate - a mysterious Green Beret Colonel named Walter Kurtz, who has been leading his personal army on illegal guerrilla missions into enemy territory. Genres: Action, Drama, War. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 33m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #48 Back to the Future 1985 He's the only kid ever to get into trouble before he was born. Director: Robert Zemeckis. Cast: Michael J. Fox, Christopher Lloyd, Lea Thompson, Crispin Glover, Thomas F. Wilson, Claudia Wells, Marc McClure, Wendie Jo Sperber, George DiCenzo, Frances Lee McCain, James Tolkan, Harry Waters Jr.. Overview: Eighties teenager Marty McFly is accidentally sent back in time to 1955, inadvertently disrupting his parents' first meeting and attracting his mother's romantic interest. Marty must repair the damage to history by rekindling his parents' romance and - with the help of his eccentric inventor friend Doc Brown - returning to 1985. Genres: Action, Adventure, Comedy, Family, Science Fiction. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 51m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #49 Sunset Boulevard 1950 "I'm ready for my close-up!" Director: Billy Wilder. Cast: William Holden, Gloria Swanson, Erich von Stroheim, Nancy Olson, Fred Clark, Lloyd Gough, Jack Webb, Buster Keaton, Cecil B. DeMille, Hedda Hopper, Anna Q. Nilsson, Ray Evans, Jay Livingston, H.B. Warner. Overview: A hack screenwriter writes a screenplay for a former silent-film star who has faded into Hollywood obscurity. Genres: Drama, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 50m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #50 Dr. Strangelove or: How I Learned to Stop Worrying and Love the Bomb 1964 Director: Stanley Kubrick. Cast: Peter Sellers, George C. Scott, Sterling Hayden, Slim Pickens, Keenan Wynn, Peter Bull, Jack Creley, Tracy Reed. Overview: An insane general starts a process to nuclear holocaust that a war room of politicians and generals frantically try to stop. A classic black and white war satire from director Stanley Kubrick starring Peter Sellers. Genres: Comedy, Drama, War. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 34m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #51 The Prestige 2006 Are You Watching Closely? Director: Christopher Nolan. Cast: Hugh Jackman, Christian Bale, Michael Caine, Scarlett Johansson, Andy Serkis, David Bowie, Piper Perabo, Rebecca Hall. Overview: A mysterious story of two magicians whose intense rivalry leads them on a life-long battle for supremacy -- full of obsession, deceit and jealousy with dangerous and deadly consequences. Genres: Drama, Fantasy, Mystery, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 10m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #52 Alien 1979 In space no one can hear you scream. Director: Ridley Scott. Cast: Sigourney Weaver, Tom Skerritt, Veronica Cartwright, Harry Dean Stanton, John Hurt, Ian Holm, Yaphet Kotto, Bolaji Badejo, Helen Horton, Eddie Powell. Overview: During its return to the earth, commercial spaceship Nostromo intercepts a distress signal from a distant planet. When a three-member team of the crew discovers a chamber containing thousands of eggs on the planet, a creature inside one of the eggs attacks an explorer. The entire crew is unaware of the impending nightmare set to descend upon them when the alien parasite planted inside its unfortunate host is birthed. Genres: Action, Horror, Science Fiction, Thriller. Countries: United Kingdom, United States of America. Runtime: 1h 57m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #53 The Lion King 1994 Life's greatest adventure is finding your place in the Circle of Life. Directors: Roger Allers, Rob Minkoff. Cast: Jonathan Taylor Thomas, Matthew Broderick, James Earl Jones, Niketa Calame, Moira Kelly, Jeremy Irons, Rowan Atkinson. Overview: A young lion cub named Simba can't wait to be king. But his uncle craves the title for himself and will stop at nothing -- even killing his own brother -- to get it. Genres: Animation, Drama, Family. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 29m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #54 The Lives of Others 2006 Das Leben Der Anderen Before the Fall of the Berlin Wall, East Germany's Secret Police Listened to Your Secrets. Director: Florian Henckel von Donnersmarck. Cast: Martina Gedeck, Ulrich Mühe, Sebastian Koch, Ulrich Tukur, Thomas Thieme, Hans-Uwe Bauer, Volkmar Kleinert, Matthias Brenner, Bastian Trost, Charly Hübner, Herbert Knaup, Marie Gruber, Hinnerk Schönemann, Thomas Arnold, Ludwig Blochberger. Overview: The tragic love story in the East Berlin with the backdrop of an undercover Stasi controlled culture. Stasi captain Wieler is ordered follow author Dreyman and plunges deeper and deeper into his life until he reaches the threshold of doubting the system. Genres: Drama, Foreign, Thriller. Country: Germany. Runtime: 2h 17m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #55 The Great Dictator 1940 Director: Charlie Chaplin. Cast: Charlie Chaplin, Charlie Chaplin, Jack Oakie, Reginald Gardiner, Henry Daniell, Billy Gilbert, Paul Weigel, Grace Hayle, Paulette Goddard, Maurice Moscovitch, Emma Dunn, Bernard Gorcey, Carter DeHaven, Eddie Gribbon, Rudolph Anders. Overview: Chaplin's first true "talking" picture, The Great Dictator daringly satirizes both Nazism and Adolf Hitler. Chaplin portrays both the dictator Adenoid Hynkel and the poor Jewish barber who is his look-alike. Genre: Comedy. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 4m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #56 Inside Out June 2015 Meet the little voices inside your head. Director: Pete Docter. Cast: Amy Poehler, Mindy Kaling, Bill Hader, Phyllis Smith, Lewis Black, Kaitlyn Dias, Paris Van Dyke, Kyle MacLachlan, Lori Alan, Richard Kind, Diane Lane, Paula Pell, Bobby Moynihan, Paula Poundstone, John Ratzenberger. Overview: Growing up can be a bumpy road, and it's no exception for Riley, who is uprooted from her Midwest life when her father starts a new job in San Francisco. Like all of us, Riley is guided by her emotions - Joy, Fear, Anger, Disgust and Sadness. The emotions live in Headquarters, the control center inside Riley's mind, where they help advise her through everyday life. As Riley and her emotions struggle to adjust to a new life in San Francisco, turmoil ensues in Headquarters. Although Joy, Riley's main and most important emotion, tries to keep things positive, the emotions conflict on how best to navigate a new city, house and school. Genres: Animation, Comedy, Family. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 42m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #57 Cinema Paradiso 1990 Nuovo Cinema Paradiso Director: Giuseppe Tornatore. Cast: Philippe Noiret, Jacques Perrin, Marco Leonardi, Salvatore Cascio. Overview: A filmmaker recalls his childhood, when he fell in love with the movies at his village's theater and formed a deep friendship with the theater's projectionist. Genres: Drama, Foreign, Romance. Countries: France, Italy. Runtime: 2h 35m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #58 The Shining 1980 The Horror is driving him crazy Director: Stanley Kubrick. Cast: Jack Nicholson, Shelley Duvall, Danny Lloyd, Scatman Crothers, Barry Nelson, Philip Stone, Joe Turkel, Anne Jackson. Overview: The Shining is a Stanley Kubrick adaptation of Steven King’s horror novel of the same name. The film takes the viewer into a remote hotel where a Jack Torrance and his wife and son must live in for the winter. One of the scariest films of all times mixes up reality and makes isolation a psychological nightmare. Genres: Drama, Horror, Thriller. Country: United Kingdom. Runtime: 2h 24m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #59 Paths of Glory 1957 Director: Stanley Kubrick. Cast: Kirk Douglas, Ralph Meeker, Adolphe Menjou, George Macready, Wayne Morris, Richard Anderson, Joe Turkel, Timothy Carey. Overview: Stanley Kubrick’s Paths of Glory is among the most powerful antiwar films ever made. A fiery Kirk Douglas stars as a World War I French colonel who goes head-to-head with the army’s ruthless top brass when his men are accused of cowardice after being unable to carry out an impossible mission. This haunting, exquisitely photographed dissection of the military machine in all its absurdity and capacity for dehumanization (a theme Kubrick would continue to explore throughout his career) is assembled with its legendary director’s customary precision, from its tense trench warfare sequences to its gripping courtroom climax to its ravaging final scene. Genres: Drama, History, War. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 26m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #60 Django Unchained 2012 Life, liberty and the pursuit of vengeance. Director: Quentin Tarantino. Cast: Leonardo DiCaprio, Christoph Waltz, Jamie Foxx, Tom Savini, Samuel L. Jackson, Kerry Washington, James Remar, Don Johnson, James Russo, M. C. Gainey, Dennis Christopher, David Steen, Dana Michelle Gourrier, Nichole Galicia, Laura Cayouette. Overview: A slave-turned-bounty hunter sets out to rescue his wife from the brutal Calvin Candie, a Mississippi plantation owner. Genres: Drama, Western. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 45m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #61 The Dark Knight Rises 2012 The Legend Ends Director: Christopher Nolan. Cast: Christian Bale, Anne Hathaway, Tom Hardy, Gary Oldman, Morgan Freeman, Michael Caine, Joseph Gordon-Levitt, Juno Temple, Nestor Carbonell, Marion Cotillard, Josh Pence, Vincent van Ommen, Tom Conti, Matthew Modine, Joey King. Overview: Following the death of District Attorney Harvey Dent, Batman assumes responsibility for Dent's crimes to protect Dent's reputation and is subsequently hunted by the Gotham City Police Department. Eight years later The Dark Knight, returns to Gotham, where he encounters the mysterious Selina Kyle and the villainous Bane, a new terrorist leader who overwhelms Gotham's finest, and the Dark Knight resurfaces to protect a city that has branded him an enemy. Genres: Action, Crime, Drama, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 45m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #62 Wall·E 2008 An adventure beyond the ordinar-E. Director: Andrew Stanton. Cast: Ben Burtt, Elissa Knight, Jeff Garlin, MacInTalk, John Ratzenberger, Sigourney Weaver, Kathy Najimy, Fred Willard. Overview: WALL-E is the last robot left on an Earth that has been overrun with garbage and all humans have fled to outer space. For 700 years he has continued to try and clean up the mess, but has developed some rather interesting human-like qualities. When a ship arrives with a sleek new type of robot, Wall-E thinks he's finally found a friend and stows away on the ship when it leaves. Genres: Animation, Adventure, Family, Science Fiction. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 44m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #63 American Beauty 1999 Look closer. Director: Sam Mendes. Cast: Kevin Spacey, Annette Bening, Thora Birch, Wes Bentley, Mena Suvari, Chris Cooper, Scott Bakula, Peter Gallagher, Allison Janney, Sam Robards, Barry Del Sherman. Overview: Lester Burnham, a depressed suburban father in a mid-life crisis, decides to turn his hectic life around after developing an infatuation with his daughter's attractive friend. Genres: Drama, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 2m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #64 Grave of the Fireflies 1988 Hotaru no haka Director: Isao Takahata. Cast: Tsutomu Tatsumi, Ayano Shiraishi, Yoshiko Shinohara, Akemi Yamaguchi. Overview: In the latter part of World War II, a boy and his sister, orphaned when their mother is killed in the firebombing of Tokyo, are left to survive on their own in what remains of civilian life in Japan. The plot follows this boy and his sister as they do their best to survive in the Japanese countryside, battling hunger, prejudice, and pride in their own quiet, personal battle. Genre: Animation. Country: Japan. Runtime: 1h 29m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #65 Aliens 1986 This Time It's War Director: James Cameron. Cast: Sigourney Weaver, Carrie Henn, Michael Biehn, Lance Henriksen, Paul Reiser, Bill Paxton, William Hope, Jenette Goldstein, Al Matthews, Mark Rolston, Colette Hiller, Daniel Kash, Cynthia Dale Scott, Ricco Ross, Tip Tipping. Overview: When Ripley's lifepod is found by a salvage crew over 50 years later, she finds that terra-formers are on the very planet they found the alien species. When the company sends a family of colonists out to investigate her story... all contact is lost with the planet and colonists. They enlist Ripley and the colonial marines to return and search for answers. Genres: Action, Horror, Science Fiction, Thriller. Countries: United Kingdom, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 17m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #66 Citizen Kane 1941 Everybody's talking about it! Director: Orson Welles. Cast: Joseph Cotten, Orson Welles, Agnes Moorehead, Ruth Warrick, Everett Sloane, George Coulouris, Dorothy Comingore, William Alland, Philip Van Zandt, Buddy Swan, Paul Stewart, Harry Shannon. Overview: Orson Wells was 26 when he made his first feature film Citizen Kane. The film became known as one of the greatest of all time and earned him international celebrity. The story is about the publishing business and how one thrill-seeker’s struggle for power negatively affected everybody he came in contact with and eventually lead to a merciless war. Genre: Drama. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 57m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #67 North by Northwest 1959 It's a deadly game of 'tag' and Cary Grant is 'it'... Director: Alfred Hitchcock. Cast: Cary Grant, Eva Marie Saint, James Mason, Jessie Royce Landis, Philip Coolidge, Doreen Lang, Josephine Hutchinson, Leo G. Carroll, Philip Ober, Adam Williams, Edward Platt, Robert Ellenstein, Martin Landau, Les Tremayne, Patrick McVey. Overview: An advertising man is mistaken for a spy, triggering a deadly cross-country chase. Genres: Action, Adventure, Drama, Mystery, Suspense, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 16m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #68 Princess Mononoke 1999 Mononoke-Hime The Fate Of The World Rests On The Courage Of One Warrior. Director: Hayao Miyazaki. Cast: Yôji Matsuda, Yuriko Ishida, Yûko Tanaka, Kaoru Kobayashi, Masahiko Nishimura, Tsunehiko Kamijô, Sumi Shimamoto, Tetsu Watanabe, Mitsuru Satô, Akira Nagoya, Akihiro Miwa, Mitsuko Mori, Hisaya Morishige, Takako Fuji. Overview: Ashitaka, a prince of the disappearing Ainu tribe, is cursed by a demonized boar god and must journey to the west to find a cure. Along the way, he encounters San, a young human woman fighting to protect the forest, and Lady Eboshi, who is trying to destroy it. Ashitaka must find a way to bring balance to this conflict. Genres: Animation, Fantasy, Adventure. Country: Japan. Runtime: 2h 14m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #69 Oldboy 2003 Oldeuboi 15 years of imprisonment... 5 days of vengeance. Director: Chan-wook Park. Cast: Choi Min-sik, Ji-tae Yu, Dae-han Ji, Byeong-ok Kim, Tae-kyung Oh, Il-han Oo, Jin-seo Yun, Dal-su Oh, Hye-jeong Kang. Overview: Oldboy is the revenge drama from Director Park Chan-wook. Based on a Manga comic it depicts the suffering path of a man who must deal with the never ending torment of having unknowingly made someone his enemy. Genres: Drama, Foreign, Thriller. Countries: Korea, New Zealand. Runtime: 2h. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #70 Vertigo 1958 Alfred Hitchcock engulfs you in a whirlpool of terror and tension Director: Alfred Hitchcock. Cast: James Stewart, Kim Novak, Barbara Bel Geddes, Tom Helmore, Henry Jones, Raymond Bailey, Ellen Corby, Konstantin Shayne, Lee Patrick. Overview: An ex-police officer is asked to follow an old friends wife who thinks she is being followed by ghosts. A classic Hitchcock about a man who’s afraid of heights and a woman he must unfortunately follow to great heights. Genres: Crime, Drama, Film Noir, Mystery, Romance, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 9m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #71 Das Boot 1982 When the hunters become the hunted Director: Wolfgang Petersen. Cast: Jürgen Prochnow, Herbert Grönemeyer, Klaus Wennemann, Hubertus Bengsch, Martin Semmelrogge, Bernd Tauber, Erwin Leder, Martin May, Heinz Hoenig, Uwe Ochsenknecht, Claude-Oliver Rudolph, Jan Fedder, Ralf Richter. Overview: A German submarine hunts allied ships during the Second World War. Soon it becomes hunted itself. The crew tries to survive below the surface, while stretching both the boat and themselves to their limits... Genres: Action, Drama, Foreign, History, Thriller, War. Countries: Germany, France. Runtime: 2h 29m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #72 M 1931 Director: Fritz Lang. Cast: Peter Lorre, Ellen Widmann, Inge Landgut, Otto Wernicke, Theodor Loos, Gustaf Gründgens, Friedrich Gnaß. Overview: M is German director Fritz Lang’s masterpiece that illustrates the portrait of a child murderer that has caused an entire city to begin rioting. The film is based on actual events. Genres: Crime, Foreign, Indie, Thriller. Country: Germany. Runtime: 1h 57m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #73 Star Wars: Episode VI - Return of the Jedi 1983 The Empire Falls... Director: Richard Marquand. Cast: Mark Hamill, Harrison Ford, Carrie Fisher, Billy Dee Williams, Anthony Daniels, Peter Mayhew, James Earl Jones, Frank Oz, Ian McDiarmid, Sebastian Shaw, David Prowse, Alec Guinness, Kenny Baker. Overview: As Rebel leaders map their strategy for an all-out attack on the Emperor's newer, bigger -- and dreaded --Death Star. Han Solo remains frozen in the cavernous desert fortress of Jabba the Hutt, the most loathsome outlaw in the universe, who is also keeping Princess Leia as a slave girl.Now a master of the Force, Luke Skywalker rescues his friends, but he cannot become a true Jedi Knight until he wages his own crucial battle against Darth Vader, who has sworn to win Luke over to the Dark side of the Force. Genres: Action, Family, Fantasy, Science Fiction, Adventure. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 15m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #74 Once Upon a Time in America 1984 Director: Sergio Leone. Cast: Robert De Niro, James Woods, Elizabeth McGovern, Tuesday Weld, Treat Williams, James Hayden, Joe Pesci, Larry Rapp, Danny Aiello, William Forsythe, Burt Young, Scott Schutzman Tiler, Rusty Jacobs, Adrian Curran, Brian Bloom. Overview: This Mafia film is the greatest and last work from Italian director Sergio Leone. Taking place in 1920 to 1960 America the film follows a group Jewish gangsters from childhood into their glory years of the prohibition and as they reunite in their later years. Genres: Crime, Drama, Thriller. Countries: Italy, United States of America. Runtime: 3h 49m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #75 Amélie 2001 Le Fabuleux Destin d'Amélie Poulain One person can change your life forever. Director: Jean-Pierre Jeunet. Cast: Audrey Tautou, Rufus, Jamel Debbouze, Claire Maurier, Isabelle Nanty, Dominique Pinon, Artus de Penguern, Yolande Moreau, Lorella Cravotta, Serge Merlin, Clotilde Mollet, Urbain Cancelier, Maurice Bénichou. Overview: Jean-Pierre Jeunet brings us the fabulous world of Amélie in his colorful film about a quirky, shy girl with an inquisitive mind and an active imagination. Audrey Tautou glows as a charming cafe girl on a mission to uncover a mystery and find true love. Jeunet delivers a glowing view of a Paris full of amiable eccentrics, with the few truly mean people receiving comedic punishment in full view. Genres: Comedy, Foreign, Romance. Countries: Germany, France. Runtime: 2h 9m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #76 Witness for the Prosecution 1957 Director: Billy Wilder. Cast: Tyrone Power, Marlene Dietrich, Charles Laughton, Elsa Lanchester, John Williams, Henry Daniell, Ian Wolfe, Torin Thatcher, Norma Varden, Una O'Connor, Francis Compton, Philip Tonge, Ruta Lee. Overview: When Leonard Vole is arrested for the sensational murder of a rich, middle-aged widow, the famous Sir Wilfrid Robarts agrees to appear on his behalf. Sir Wilfrid, recovering from a near-fatal heart attack, is *supposed* to be on a diet of bland, civil suits. But the lure of the criminal courts is too much for him, especially when the case is so difficult: Vole's only alibi witness is his wife, the calm and coldly calculating Christine Vole. Sir Wilfrid's task becomes even more impossible when Christine agrees to be a witness not for the defence but for the prosecution. Genres: Drama, Mystery, Thriller, Crime. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 56m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #77 Reservoir Dogs 1992 Every dog has his day. Director: Quentin Tarantino. Cast: Harvey Keitel, Tim Roth, Michael Madsen, Chris Penn, Steve Buscemi, Lawrence Tierney, Edward Bunker, Quentin Tarantino, Randy Brooks, Kirk Baltz, Steven Wright, Rich Turner, David Steen, Tony Cosmo, Stevo Polyi. Overview: A botched robbery indicates a police informant, and the pressure mounts in the aftermath at a warehouse. Crime begets violence as the survivors -- veteran Mr. White, newcomer Mr. Orange, psychopathic parolee Mr. Blonde, bickering weasel Mr. Pink and Nice Guy Eddie -- unravel. Genres: Crime, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 39m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #78 Braveheart 1995 Every man dies. Not every man truly lives. Director: Mel Gibson. Cast: Mel Gibson, Catherine McCormack, Sophie Marceau, Patrick McGoohan, Angus Macfadyen, Brendan Gleeson, James Robinson, James Cosmo, Sean McGinley, Gerda Stevenson, Mhairi Calvey, Jeanne Marine, Sean Lawlor, Sandy Nelson, Alan Tall. Overview: Enraged at the slaughter of Murron -- his new bride and childhood love -- legendary Scottish warrior William Wallace slays a platoon of the local English lord's soldiers. This leads the village to revolt and, eventually, the entire country to rise up against English rule. Genres: Action, Adventure, Drama, History, War. Countries: United Kingdom, Ireland, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 57m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #79 Toy Story 3 2010 No toy gets left behind. Director: Lee Unkrich. Cast: Tom Hanks, Tim Allen, Joan Cusack, Ned Beatty, Michael Keaton, Whoopi Goldberg, Bonnie Hunt, Wallace Shawn, John Ratzenberger, Don Rickles, Estelle Harris. Overview: Woody, Buzz, and the rest of Andy's toys haven't been played with in years. With Andy about to go to college, the gang find themselves accidentally left at a nefarious day care center. The toys must band together to escape and return home to Andy. Genres: Animation, Family, Adventure, Comedy, Fantasy. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 43m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #80 A Clockwork Orange 1971 Being the adventures of a young man whose principal interests are rape, ultra-violence and Beethoven. Director: Stanley Kubrick. Cast: Malcolm McDowell, Patrick Magee, Adrienne Corri, Michael Bates, Warren Clarke, James Marcus, Michael Tarn, Carl Duering, Paul Farrell, Miriam Karlin, Sheila Raynor, Aubrey Morris, Godfrey Quigley, Clive Francis, Richard Connaught. Overview: A Clockwork Orange is one of Stanley Kubrick’s greatest works about a gang of dangerous teenagers in future Britain. One member tries to get out and is beaten up and left for the police. He’s given the option to help the police find his old gang or stay in jail for a long time. Based on a novel, the film was personally put into theatres by Kubrick adding to the film's importance and strength. Genres: Crime, Foreign, Science Fiction. Country: United Kingdom. Runtime: 2h 16m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #81 Taxi Driver 1976 On every street in every city, there's a nobody who dreams of being a somebody. Director: Martin Scorsese. Cast: Robert De Niro, Cybill Shepherd, Harvey Keitel, Jodie Foster, Peter Boyle, Leonard Harris, Albert Brooks, Diahnne Abbott, Frank Adu, Gino Ardito. Overview: Robert De Niro stars as Travis Bickle in this oppressive psychodrama about a Vietnam veteran who rebels against the decadence and immorality of big city life in New York while working the nightshift as a taxi driver. Genres: Crime, Drama, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 53m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #82 Double Indemnity 1944 From the Moment they met it was Murder! Director: Billy Wilder. Cast: Fred MacMurray, Barbara Stanwyck, Edward G. Robinson, Porter Hall, Richard Gaines, Jean Heather, Tom Powers, Fortunio Bonanova, John Philliber. Overview: Double Indemnity is a film noir thriller from directory Billy Wilder from 1944 in which the protagonist sets up an insurance fraud. Genres: Drama, Film Noir, Mystery, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 47m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #83 Requiem for a Dream 2000 Director: Darren Aronofsky. Cast: Ellen Burstyn, Jared Leto, Jennifer Connelly, Marlon Wayans, Christopher McDonald, Louise Lasser. Overview: The hopes and dreams of four ambitious people are shattered when their drug addictions begin spiraling out of control. A look into addiction and how it overcomes the mind and body. Genres: Drama, Indie. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 42m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #84 To Kill a Mockingbird 1962 If you have read the novel, you will relive every treasured moment. . .If not, a deeply moving experience awaits you! Director: Robert Mulligan. Cast: Gregory Peck, Mary Badham, Phillip Alford, Robert Duvall, John Megna, Frank Overton, Rosemary Murphy, Ruth White, Brock Peters, Estelle Evans, Alice Ghostley, Paul Fix, Collin Wilcox Paxton, James Anderson, William Windom. Overview: To Kill A Mockingbird is the film adaptation of the classic book by Harper Lee. The film tells the story of a child in a small American town in the 1930’s where color prejudice, racial hatred, and taking the law into your own hands were everyday events. Gregory Peck would receive an Oscar for his excellent portrayal of a single father named Atticus Finch. Genres: Crime, Drama, Mystery. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 9m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #85 Lawrence of Arabia 1962 Director: David Lean. Cast: Peter O'Toole, Alec Guinness, Anthony Quinn, Jack Hawkins, Omar Sharif, Claude Rains, Anthony Quayle, José Ferrer, Arthur Kennedy, Donald Wolfit, Zia Mohyeddin, I.S. Johar, Gamil Ratib, Michel Ray, John Dimech. Overview: Lawrence of Arabia is the classic film from David Lean starring Peter O’Toole and based on the autobiography from Thomas Edward Lawrence who during the first World War was on assignment by the British Empire in Arabia. The film would become a cult classic and is known today as a masterpiece. Genres: Action, Adventure, Drama, Foreign, History. Runtime: 3h 36m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #86 Eternal Sunshine of the Spotless Mind 2004 I already forget how I used to feel about you. Director: Michel Gondry. Cast: Jim Carrey, Kate Winslet, Elijah Wood, Mark Ruffalo, Kirsten Dunst, Tom Wilkinson, Ryan Whitney, Jane Adams, Debbon Ayer, David Cross, Gerry Robert Byrne, Brian Price, Josh Flitter, Paul Litowsky, Lola Daehler. Overview: A man, Joel Barish, heartbroken that his girlfriend Clementine underwent a procedure to erase him from her memory, decides to do the same. However, as he watches his memories of her fade away, he realizes that he still loves her, and may be too late to correct his mistake. Genres: Science Fiction, Drama, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 48m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #87 Full Metal Jacket 1987 Vietnam can kill me, but it can’t make me care. Director: Stanley Kubrick. Cast: Matthew Modine, Adam Baldwin, Vincent D'Onofrio, R. Lee Ermey, Dorian Harewood, Kevyn Major Howard, Arliss Howard, Ed O'Ross, John Terry, Kieron Jecchinis, Kirk Taylor, Tim Colceri, Jon Stafford, Bruce Boa, Ian Tyler. Overview: A pragmatic U.S. Marine observes the dehumanizing effects the U.S.-Vietnam War has on his fellow recruits from their brutal boot camp training to the bloody street fighting in Hue. Genres: Drama, War. Countries: United Kingdom, United States of America. Runtime: 1h 56m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #88 The Sting 1973 ...all it takes is a little Confidence. Director: George Roy Hill. Cast: Paul Newman, Robert Redford, Robert Shaw, Charles Durning, Ray Walston, Eileen Brennan, Harold Gould, John Heffernan, Dana Elcar, Jack Kehoe, Dimitra Arliss, Robert Earl Jones, James Sloyan, Charles Dierkop, Lee Paul. Overview: Set in the 1930's this intricate caper deals with an ambitious small-time crook and a veteran con man who seek revenge on a vicious crime lord who murdered one of their gang. Genres: Comedy, Crime, Drama. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 9m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #89 Amadeus 1984 Amadeus. The man. The music. The magic. The madness. The murder. The mystery. The motion picture. Director: Milos Forman. Cast: F. Murray Abraham, Tom Hulce, Elizabeth Berridge, Roy Dotrice, Simon Callow, Christine Ebersole, Jeffrey Jones, Barbara Bryne. Overview: Amadeus is the story of the last ten years of Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart’s life told by Director Milos Forman. The main story is about the conflict between a genius’ need for fun and a society that disgraces that type of thing. A spectacular picture about one of the most gifted composers of all times with memorable acting by Tom Hulce who played Mozart. Genres: Drama, History, Music. Countries: Austria, Czech Republic. Runtime: 2h 40m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #90 The Bicycle Thief 1949 Ladri di biciclette Director: Vittorio De Sica. Cast: Lamberto Maggiorani, Enzo Staiola, Lianella Carell, Carlo Jachino, Giulio Chiari. Overview: A man and his son search for a stolen bicycle vital for his job. Genres: Drama, Foreign. Country: Italy. Runtime: 1h 33m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #91 Singin' in the Rain 1952 Directors: Stanley Donen, Gene Kelly. Cast: Gene Kelly, Donald O'Connor, Debbie Reynolds, Jean Hagen, Millard Mitchell, Douglas Fowley, Rita Moreno. Overview: Hollywood's attempts to move from the 'silent' era to the 'Talkies' are not going as planned. Genres: Comedy, Musical. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 43m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #92 Monty Python and the Holy Grail 1975 Makes Ben Hur look like an Epic Directors: Terry Gilliam, Terry Jones. Cast: Graham Chapman, John Cleese, Eric Idle, Michael Palin, Terry Gilliam, Terry Jones, Graham Chapman, Graham Chapman, Graham Chapman, John Cleese, John Cleese, John Cleese, John Cleese, John Cleese, Eric Idle. Overview: The King Arthur and The Round Table saga about the search for the Holy Grail is portrayed a bit differently in this comedy from Monty Python. With a killer monster rabbit and many outrageous encounters this smart comedy has become a cult classic. Genres: Action, Comedy, Foreign. Country: United Kingdom. Runtime: 1h 31m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #93 Snatch 2000 Stealin' Stones and Breakin' Bones. Director: Guy Ritchie. Cast: Jason Statham, Brad Pitt, Stephen Graham, Vinnie Jones, Alan Ford, Dennis Farina, Rade Šerbedžija, Robbie Gee, Lennie James, Benicio Del Toro, Mike Reid, Jason Flemyng, Andy Beckwith, William Beck, Ewen Bremner. Overview: The is second film from British director Guy Ritchie. Snatch tells an obscure story similar to his first fast paced crazy character colliding filled film “Lock, Stock & Two Smoking Barrels.” The film has two overlapping stories– one is the search for a stolen diamond and the other about a boxing promoter who’s having trouble with a psychotic gangster. Genres: Action, Comedy, Foreign, Thriller, Crime. Countries: United Kingdom, United States of America. Runtime: 1h 44m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #94 2001: A Space Odyssey 1968 The Ultimate Trip. Director: Stanley Kubrick. Cast: Keir Dullea, Douglas Rain, Gary Lockwood, William Sylvester, Daniel Richter, Leonard Rossiter, Margaret Tyzack, Robert Beatty, Sean Sullivan. Overview: The highly respected and often cited milestone in Science Fiction cinema. Director Stanley Kubrick takes us into the future, into outer space and aboard a spacecraft that’s controlled by a seemingly trustworthy computer named HAL. Genres: Drama, Mystery, Science Fiction, Thriller. Countries: United Kingdom, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 21m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #95 The Kid 1921 6 reels of Joy. Director: Charlie Chaplin. Cast: Charlie Chaplin, Jackie Coogan, Edna Purviance, Albert Austin, Beulah Bains, Carl Miller, Henry Bergman, Kitty Bradbury, Nellie Bly Baker, F. Blinn, Frances Cochran, Frank Campeau, Bliss Chevalier, Elsie Codd, Jack Coogan Sr.. Overview: Considered one of Charlie Chaplin's best films, The Kid also made a star of little Jackie Coogan, who plays a boy cared for by The Tramp when he's abandoned by his mother, Edna. Later, Edna has a change of heart and aches to be reunited with her son. When she finds him and wrests him from The Tramp, it makes for what turns out be one of the most heart-wrenching scenes ever included in a comedy. Genres: Comedy, Drama. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 8m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #96 L.A. Confidential 1997 Everything is suspect... Everyone is for sale... And nothing is what it seems. Director: Curtis Hanson. Cast: Kevin Spacey, Guy Pearce, Danny DeVito, James Cromwell, Kim Basinger, Russell Crowe, David Strathairn. Overview: Three detectives in the corrupt and brutal L.A. police force of the 1950s use differing methods to uncover a conspiracy behind the shotgun slayings of the patrons at an all-night diner in this lush tribute to tough film noir crime films. Based on the multi-layered James Ellroy novel. Genres: Crime, Drama, Mystery, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 18m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #97 Rashomon 1950 Rashômon The husband, the wife...or the bandit? Director: Akira Kurosawa. Cast: Toshirō Mifune, Machiko Kyô, Masayuki Mori, Takashi Shimura, Minoru Chiaki, Kichijirô Ueda, Noriko Honma, Daisuke Katô. Overview: In ancient Japan a crime take place as told from three different travelers who have experienced the crime: a man being killed and his wife being raped. Which if any of the stories is true? A Akira Kurosawa film about morals, truth, and communication. Genres: Crime, Drama, Mystery. Country: Japan. Runtime: 1h 28m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #98 For a Few Dollars More 1965 Per qualche dollaro in più Director: Sergio Leone. Cast: Clint Eastwood, Lee Van Cleef, Gian Maria Volonté, Klaus Kinski, Mara Krupp, Luigi Pistilli, Joseph Egger, Panos Papadopulos, Benito Stefanelli. Overview: For a Few Dollars More is a Spaghetti Western from Italian director Sergio Leone from 1965 and the sequel to A Fistful of Dollars. Genres: Action, Western. Countries: Italy, Spain, Germany. Runtime: 2h 10m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #99 Toy Story 1995 The adventure takes off! Director: John Lasseter. Cast: Tom Hanks, Tim Allen, John Morris, Don Rickles, Jim Varney, Wallace Shawn, John Ratzenberger, Annie Potts, Erik von Detten, Laurie Metcalf, R. Lee Ermey, Sarah Freeman. Overview: Woody the cowboy is young Andy’s favorite toy. Yet this changes when Andy get the new super toy Buzz Lightyear for his birthday. Now that Woody is no longer number one he plans his revenge on Buzz. Toy Story is a milestone in film history for being the first feature film to use entirely computer animation. Genres: Adventure, Animation, Comedy, Family, Fantasy. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 21m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #100 Inglourious Basterds 2009 Once upon a time in Nazi occupied France... Director: Quentin Tarantino. Cast: Brad Pitt, Christoph Waltz, Mélanie Laurent, Diane Kruger, Mike Myers, Michael Fassbender, Samuel L. Jackson, Eli Roth, Til Schweiger, B.J. Novak, Gedeon Burkhard, Omar Doom, Samm Levine, Paul Rust, Michael Bacall. Overview: In Nazi-occupied France during World War II, a group of Jewish-American soldiers known as "The Basterds" are chosen specifically to spread fear throughout the Third Reich by scalping and brutally killing Nazis. The Basterds, lead by Lt. Aldo Raine soon cross paths with a French-Jewish teenage girl who runs a movie theater in Paris which is targeted by the soldiers. Genres: Adventure, Drama, Action, Thriller, War. Countries: Germany, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 33m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #101 The Apartment 1960 Movie-wise, there has never been anything like it - laugh-wise, love-wise, or otherwise-wise Director: Billy Wilder. Cast: Jack Lemmon, Shirley MacLaine, Fred MacMurray, Ray Walston, Jack Kruschen, Naomi Stevens, Hope Holiday, Edie Adams, Joan Shawlee, Johnny Seven. Overview: The Apartment came out shortly after the success of ‘Some Like it Hot’ from director Billy Wilder and thus making it the most successful films of the year. Full of trivialities this comedy is a harsh critic of coporate world and the American way of life. Genres: Comedy, Drama, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 5m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #102 All About Eve 1950 It's all about women...and their men! Director: Joseph L. Mankiewicz. Cast: Bette Davis, Anne Baxter, George Sanders, Celeste Holm, Gary Merrill, Hugh Marlowe, Gregory Ratoff, Barbara Bates, Marilyn Monroe, Thelma Ritter. Overview: Director Mankiewisz’s tragic comedy about the American show business is one of the darkest and most cynical films ever made. Bette Davis is brilliant in her roll as a once Broadway Diva who takes care of the promotion for the talented actress Eva (played by Anne Baxter). All together the film won six Oscars in 1951. Genres: Comedy, Drama. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 18m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #103 The Treasure of the Sierra Madre 1948 The nearer they get to their treasure, the farther they get from the law Director: John Huston. Cast: Humphrey Bogart, Walter Huston, Tim Holt, Bruce Bennett, Barton MacLane, Alfonso Bedoya, Arturo Soto Rangel, Manuel Dondé, José Torvay, Margarito Luna, Robert Blake, John Huston. Overview: Fred C. Dobbs and Bob Curtin, both down on their luck in Tampico, Mexico in 1925, meet up with a grizzled prospector named Howard and decide to join with him in search of gold in the wilds of central Mexico. Through enormous difficulties, they eventually succeed in finding gold, but bandits, the elements, and most especially greed threaten to turn their success into disaster. Genres: Action, Adventure, Drama, Western. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 6m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #104 A Separation 2011 Jodái-e Náder az Simin / جدایی نادر از سیمین Ugly truth, sweet lies. Director: Asghar Farhadi. Cast: Leila Hatami, Kimia Hosseini, Merila Zarei, Peyman Moaadi, Sareh Bayat, Shahab Hosseini, Ali-Asghar Shahbazi, Shirin Yazdanbakhsh, Mohammad Sajadian, Armine Zeytounchian. Overview: The movie is centered on a couple, Nader and Simin, and their 11-year-old daughter, Termeh. Nader and Simin are about to leave the country for good; however, Nader has a change of heart and decides to stay and look after his father who suffers from Alzheimer's disease. Simin is determined to get a divorce and leave the country with her daughter, but the court does not find in her favor. Simin goes to live with her mother and Termeh returns to live with her father with the hope that her mother will be back some day. Genre: Drama. Country: Iran. Runtime: 2h 3m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #105 Indiana Jones and the Last Crusade 1989 The man with the hat is back. And this time, he's bringing his Dad. Director: Steven Spielberg. Cast: Harrison Ford, Sean Connery, Denholm Elliott, Alison Doody, John Rhys-Davies, Julian Glover, River Phoenix, Michael Byrne, Kevork Malikyan, Robert Eddison, Richard Young, Alexei Sayle, Paul Maxwell, Isla Blair, Vernon Dobtcheff. Overview: Three years after he recovered The Ark of the Covenant. Jones recovered an artifact that he found as a kid, the Cross of Francisco De Coronado from treasure hunters. Now, Jones discovers the history of another biblical artifact called "The Holy Grail". He was also informed that his father, Henry Jones is missing. Jones has to find his father who is looking for the Grail. However, Jones will become involved in the search of the Holy Grail along with his father, as well as fighting the Nazis to reach it. Genres: Action, Adventure. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 7m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #106 Metropolis 1927 Director: Fritz Lang. Cast: Fritz Alberti, Gustav Fröhlich, Brigitte Helm, Rudolf Klein-Rogge, Fritz Rasp, Theodor Loos, Erwin Biswanger, Heinrich George, Olaf Storm, Hanns Leo Reich, Helene Weigel, Heinrich Gotho, Margarete Lanner, Alfred Abel. Overview: Metropolis is Fritz Lang’s monumental silent science fiction film from 1927. The film’s strong imagery shows us the future city of Metropolis where the society has been divided into the elite living high above ground and the workers living underground. Joh Frederson, the son of the leader of the city falls in love with a beautiful woman, Maria, who is fighting to break the societal separation. Genres: Drama, Foreign, Science Fiction. Country: Germany. Runtime: 3h 30m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #107 Yojimbo 1961 Yôjinbô Director: Akira Kurosawa. Cast: Toshirô Mifune, Tatsuya Nakadai, Yôko Tsukasa, Isuzu Yamada, Daisuke Katô, Takashi Shimura, Seizaburô Kawazu, Hiroshi Tachikawa, Yôsuke Natsuki, Eijirô Tôno, Kamatari Fujiwara, Ikio Sawamura, Atsushi Watanabe, Susumu Fujita, Kyû Sazanka. Overview: The incomparable Toshiro Mifune stars in Akira Kurosawa’s visually stunning and darkly comic Yojimbo. To rid a terror-stricken village of corruption, wily masterless samurai Sanjuro turns a range war between two evil clans to his own advantage. Remade twice, by Sergio Leone and Walter Hill, this exhilarating genre-twister remains one of the most influential and entertaining films of all time. Genres: Action, Drama, Foreign, Indie, Thriller. Country: Japan. Runtime: 1h 50m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #108 The Third Man 1949 Hunted by men...Sought by WOMEN! Director: Carol Reed. Cast: Joseph Cotten, Alida Valli, Orson Welles, Trevor Howard, Bernard Lee, Paul Hörbiger, Siegfried Breuer, Wilfrid Hyde-White, Hedwig Bleibtreu, Annie Rosar, Erich Ponto, Ernst Deutsch. Overview: An American pulp writer arrives in post-WWII Vienna only to find that the friend who waited for him is killed under mysterious circumstances. The ensuing mystery entangles him in his friend's involvement in the black market, with the multinational police, and with his Czech girlfriend. Genres: Mystery, Thriller, Film Noir. Countries: Austria, United Kingdom. Runtime: 1h 44m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #109 Scarface 1983 He loved the American dream. With a vengeance. Director: Brian De Palma. Cast: Al Pacino, Steven Bauer, Michelle Pfeiffer, Mary Elizabeth Mastrantonio, Robert Loggia, Miriam Colon, F. Murray Abraham, Paul Shenar, Harris Yulin, Ángel Salazar, Arnaldo Santana, Pepe Serna, Michael P. Moran, Al Israel, Dennis Holahan. Overview: A remake of a classic gangster film of the same name from Howard Hawks in 1932. Scarface tells the rise and fall of the gangster and drug dealer Tony Montana who came to Miami as a refugee from Cuba in the 1980’s. A cult film and one of the most celebrated films of all time. Genres: Action, Adventure, Crime, Drama, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 50m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #110 Batman Begins 2005 Evil fears the knight. Director: Christopher Nolan. Cast: Christian Bale, Liam Neeson, Michael Caine, Katie Holmes, Gary Oldman, Cillian Murphy, Rutger Hauer, Mark Boone Junior, Ken Watanabe, Linus Roache, Richard Brake, Sara Stewart, Tim Booth, Rena Sofer, Tom Wilkinson. Overview: Bruce Wayne has watched his home, Gotham City, turn into a crime infested abyss throughout his entire life, so he decides to become the hero Gotham needs- Batman! Genres: Action, Adventure, Crime, Fantasy, Science Fiction, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 21m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #111 Some Like It Hot 1959 The movie too HOT for words! Director: Billy Wilder. Cast: Marilyn Monroe, Tony Curtis, Jack Lemmon, George Raft, Joe E. Brown, Nehemiah Persoff, Joan Shawlee, Barbara Drew, Edward G. Robinson Jr., Pat O'Brien, George E. Stone, Mike Mazurki. Overview: Two musicians witness a mob hit and struggle to find a way out of the city before they are found by the gangsters. Their only opportunity is to join an all-girl as they leave on a tour. To make their getaway, they must first disguise themselves as women, then keep their identities secret and deal with the problems this brings - such as an attractive bandmate rich and very determined suitor. Genres: Comedy, Crime, Musical, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #112 Unforgiven 1992 It's a hell of a thing, killing a man. Director: Clint Eastwood. Cast: Clint Eastwood, Gene Hackman, Richard Harris, Jaimz Woolvett, Anna Levine, Saul Rubinek, Frances Fisher, David Mucci, Rob Campbell, Anthony James, Morgan Freeman. Overview: Unforgiven is Clint Eastwood’s grandiose salute to classic western films. The film stars Clint Eastwood, as William Munny, a retired gunslinger who returns for one last job. Unforgiven won four Academy Awards including Best Picture. Genres: Action, Drama, Western. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 11m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #113 3 Idiots 2009 Director: Rajkumar Hirani. Cast: Aamir Khan, Kareena Kapoor, Madhavan, Sharman Joshi, Boman Irani, Mona Singh. Overview: Two friends embark on a quest for a lost buddy. On this journey, they encounter a long forgotten bet, a wedding they must crash, and a funeral that goes out of control. As they make their way through the perilous landscape, another journey begins: their inner journey through memory lane and the story of their friend- the irrepressible free-thinker Rancho, who in his unique way, changed their lives Genres: Comedy, Eastern, Foreign. Country: India. Runtime: 2h 50m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #114 Up 2009 Directors: Pete Docter, Bob Peterson. Cast: Edward Asner, Christopher Plummer, Jordan Nagai, Bob Peterson, Delroy Lindo, Josh Cooley, John Ratzenberger, David Kaye, Jeremy Leary, Elie Docter, Mickie McGowan, Danny Mann, Donald Fullilove, Jess Harnell, Jerome Ranft. Overview: After a lifetime of dreaming of traveling the world, 78-year-old homebody Carl flies away on an unbelievable adventure with Russell, an 8-year-old Wilderness Explorer, unexpectedly in tow. Together, the unlikely pair embarks on a thrilling odyssey full of jungle beasts and rough terrain. Genres: Adventure, Animation, Comedy, Family. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 36m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #115 Raging Bull 1980 Director: Martin Scorsese. Cast: Robert De Niro, Joe Pesci, Cathy Moriarty, Frank Vincent, Nicholas Colasanto, Theresa Saldana, Mario Gallo. Overview: An emotionally self-destructive boxer's journey through life, as the violence and temper that leads him to the top in the ring, destroys his life outside it. Genres: Drama, Sports Film. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 10m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #116 Downfall 2004 Der Untergang April 1945, a nation awaits its...Downfall Director: Oliver Hirschbiegel. Cast: Bruno Ganz, Alexandra Maria Lara, Corinna Harfouch, Ulrich Matthes, Juliane Köhler, Heino Ferch, Christian Berkel, Thomas Kretschmann, Ulrich Noethen, Birgit Minichmayr, Rolf Kanies, Justus von Dohnanyi, Michael Mendl, André Hennicke, Christian Redl. Overview: In April of 1945, Germany stands at the brink of defeat with the Russian Army closing in from the east and the Allied Expeditionary Force attacking from the west. In Berlin, capital of the Third Reich, Adolf Hitler proclaims that Germany will still achieve victory and orders his Generals and advisers to fight to the last man. "Downfall" explores these final days of the Reich, where senior German leaders (such as Himmler and Goring) began defecting from their beloved Fuhrer, in an effort to save their own lives, while still others (Joseph Goebbels) pledge to die with Hitler. Hitler, himself, degenerates into a paranoid shell of a man, full of optimism one moment and suicidal depression the next. When the end finally does comes, and Hitler lies dead by his own hand, what is left of his military must find a way to end the killing that is the Battle of Berlin, and lay down their arms in surrender. Genres: Drama, Foreign, History, War. Countries: Austria, Germany, Italy, Russian Federation. Runtime: 2h 36m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #117 The Hunt 2013 Jagten Director: Thomas Vinterberg. Cast: Mads Mikkelsen, Alexandra Rapaport, Thomas Bo Larsen, Anne Louise Hassing, Lars Ranthe, Susse Wold, Ole Dupont, Annika Wedderkopp. Overview: A teacher lives a lonely life, all the while struggling over his son’s custody. His life slowly gets better as he finds love and receives good news from his son, but his new luck is about to be brutally shattered by an innocent little lie. Genres: Drama, Foreign. Country: Denmark. Runtime: 1h 51m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #118 Mad Max: Fury Road May 2015 What a Lovely Day. Director: George Miller. Cast: Tom Hardy, Charlize Theron, Hugh Keays-Byrne, Nicholas Hoult, Josh Helman, Rosie Huntington-Whiteley, Zoë Kravitz, Riley Keough, Nathan Jones, Richard Norton, Abbey Lee, Courtney Eaton, Megan Gale, Melissa Jaffer, Richard Carter. Overview: An apocalyptic story set in the furthest reaches of our planet, in a stark desert landscape where humanity is broken, and most everyone is crazed fighting for the necessities of life. Within this world exist two rebels on the run who just might be able to restore order. There's Max, a man of action and a man of few words, who seeks peace of mind following the loss of his wife and child in the aftermath of the chaos. And Furiosa, a woman of action and a woman who believes her path to survival may be achieved if she can make it across the desert back to her childhood homeland. Genres: Thriller, Action, Adventure. Countries: Australia, United States of America. Runtime: 2h. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #119 Chinatown 1974 Director: Roman Polanski. Cast: Jack Nicholson, Faye Dunaway, John Huston, Perry Lopez, John Hillerman, Darrell Zwerling, Diane Ladd, Roy Jenson, Roman Polanski, Richard Bakalyan, Bruce Glover. Overview: A private detective investigating an adultery case stumbles on to a scheme of murder that has something to do with water. Genres: Crime, Drama, Mystery, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 11m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #120 The Great Escape 1963 Put a fence in front of these men...and they'll climb it... Director: John Sturges. Cast: Steve McQueen, James Garner, Richard Attenborough, James Donald, Charles Bronson, Donald Pleasence, James Coburn, Hannes Messemer, David McCallum, Gordon Jackson, John Leyton, Angus Lennie, Nigel Stock, Robert Graf, Jud Taylor. Overview: The Nazis, exasperated at the number of escapes from their prison camps by a relatively small number of Allied prisoners, relocates them to a high-security "escape-proof" camp to sit out the remainder of the war. Undaunted, the prisoners plan one of the most ambitious escape attempts of World War II. Based on a true story. Genres: Action, Adventure, Drama, History, War. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 52m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #121 Die Hard 1988 40 Stories. Twelve Terrorists. One Cop. Director: John McTiernan. Cast: Bruce Willis, Reginald VelJohnson, Bonnie Bedelia, Alexander Godunov, Paul Gleason, William Atherton, De'voreaux White, Hart Bochner, Alan Rickman, Dennis Hayden, James Shigeta, Robert Davi, Bob Jennings. Overview: NYPD cop John McClane's plan to reconcile with his estranged wife, Holly, is thrown for a serious loop when minutes after he arrives at her office, the entire building is overtaken by a group of pitiless terrorists. With little help from the LAPD, wisecracking McClane sets out to single-handedly rescue the hostages and bring the bad guys down. Genres: Action, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 11m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #122 Good Will Hunting 1997 Some people can never believe in themselves, until someone believes in them. Director: Gus Van Sant. Cast: Robin Williams, Matt Damon, Ben Affleck, Stellan Skarsgård, Minnie Driver, Casey Affleck, Cole Hauser, John Mighton, Rachel Majorowski, Colleen McCauley, Matt Mercier, Ralph St. George, Rob Lynds, Dan Washington, Alison Folland. Overview: Gus van Sant’s film tells the story of a mathematically gifted young man, named Will Hunting, who’s on the search for his identity while ruthlessly eluding his fellow friends. His first introspective look at himself is achieved after meeting with the therapist Sean Maguire. Genres: Drama, Indie, Romance. Countries: Canada, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 2m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #123 Heat 1995 A Los Angeles crime saga. Director: Michael Mann. Cast: Al Pacino, Robert De Niro, Val Kilmer, Jon Voight, Tom Sizemore, Diane Venora, Amy Brenneman, Ashley Judd, Mykelti Williamson, Wes Studi, Ted Levine, Dennis Haysbert, William Fichtner, Natalie Portman, Tom Noonan. Overview: Obsessive master thief McCauley leads a crack crew on various military-style heists across L.A. while equally obsessive detective Hanna tracks him. Each man recognizes and respects the other's ability and dedication, even as they express the willingness to kill each other, if necessary. Genres: Action, Crime, Drama, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 51m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #124 On the Waterfront 1954 Director: Elia Kazan. Cast: Marlon Brando, Lee J. Cobb, Karl Malden, Eva Marie Saint, Rod Steiger, Pat Henning, Leif Erickson, James Westerfield. Overview: On the Waterfront is a social criticism gangster film from director Elia Kazan, about an ex-boxer, who is part of the corruption of the trade unions for the men working on the waterfront in New York. A film about mob violence that won eight Academy Awards. Genres: Crime, Drama, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 48m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #125 Pan's Labyrinth 2006 El Laberinto del Fauno What happens when make-believe believes it's real? Director: Guillermo del Toro. Cast: Ivana Baquero, Maribel Verdú, Sergi López, Doug Jones, Ariadna Gil, Álex Angulo, Roger Casamajor. Overview: Pans Labyrinth is the exquisitely produced fantasy film from Mexican director Guillermo del Toro who is actually famous for his works in science-fiction and horror. The film stars a little girl lost in a fantasy world. The film won three Academy Awards in 2007. Genres: Drama, Fantasy, Foreign, Science Fiction. Countries: Spain, Mexico, United States of America. Runtime: 1h 59m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #126 Mr. Smith Goes to Washington 1939 Director: Frank Capra. Cast: Jean Arthur, James Stewart, Claude Rains, Edward Arnold, Guy Kibbee, Thomas Mitchell, Eugene Pallette, Beulah Bondi, Harry Carey, Ruth Donnelly, Grant Mitchell, Porter Hall, Pierre Watkin, Charles Lane, William Demarest. Overview: A naive man is appointed to fill a vacancy in the US Senate. His plans promptly collide with political corruption, but he doesn't back down. Genre: Drama. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 9m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #127 The Bridge on the River Kwai 1957 It spans a whole new world of entertainment! Director: David Lean. Cast: William Holden, Jack Hawkins, Alec Guinness, Sessue Hayakawa, James Donald, Geoffrey Horne, André Morell, Peter Williams. Overview: A classic story of English POWs in Burma forced to build a bridge to aid the war effort of their Japanese captors. British and American intelligence officers conspire to blow up the structure, but Col. Nicholson , the commander who supervised the bridge's construction, has acquired a sense of pride in his creation and tries to foil their plans. Genres: Action, Drama, Foreign, History, War. Countries: United Kingdom, Sri Lanka. Runtime: 2h 41m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #128 My Neighbor Totoro 1988 Tonari no Totoro Director: Hayao Miyazaki. Cast: Noriko Hidaka, Hitoshi Takagi, Chika Sakamoto, Shigesato Itoi, Sumi Shimamoto, Tanie Kitabayashi. Overview: Two young girls, Mei and Satsuki, move into a new home close to the hospital that their mother is in. In their yard is a large tree which is home to three Totoros, gods of the forest. Soon after, news from the hospital comes up that their mother can't come home as promised, so Mei (the younger) runs away from home to visit her mom. Satsuki then needs to turn to Totoro for help to find her. Genres: Fantasy, Animation, Science Fiction, Family, Foreign. Country: Japan. Runtime: 1h 26m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #129 Ran 1985 Director: Akira Kurosawa. Cast: Tatsuya Nakadai, Akira Terao, Jinpachi Nezu, Daisuke Ryû. Overview: A story of greed, a lust for power, and ultimate revenge when an elderly lord abdicates to his three sons, and the two corrupt ones turn against him. A profound examination of the folly of war and the crumbling of one family under the weight of betrayal, greed, and the insatiable thirst for power. Genres: Action, Adventure, Drama, Foreign, History, Indie. Countries: France, Japan. Runtime: 2h 40m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #130 The Gold Rush 1925 Director: Charlie Chaplin. Cast: Charlie Chaplin, Georgia Hale, Mack Swain, Tom Murray, Henry Bergman, Malcolm Waite. Overview: A lone prospector ventures into Alaska looking for gold. He gets mixed up with some burly characters and falls in love with the beautiful Georgia. He tries to win her heart with his singular charm. Genres: Comedy, Drama, Family. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 22m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #131 Ikiru 1952 Director: Akira Kurosawa. Cast: Takashi Shimura, Shinichi Himori, Haruo Tanaka, Nobuo Kaneko, Bokuzen Hidari, Miki Odagiri. Overview: Kanji Watanabe is a middle-aged man who has worked in the same monotonous bureaucratic position for decades. Learning he has cancer, he starts to look for the meaning of his life. Genres: Drama, Foreign, Indie. Country: Japan. Runtime: 2h 23m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #132 The Seventh Seal 1957 Det sjunde inseglet Director: Ingmar Bergman. Cast: Max von Sydow, Gunnar Björnstrand, Bengt Ekerot, Nils Poppe, Bibi Andersson, Inga Gill, Maud Hansson, Inga Landgré, Gunnel Lindblom, Bertil Anderberg, Anders Ek, Åke Fridell, Gunnar Olsson, Erik Strandmark. Overview: Ingmar Bergmann’s masterpiece film about confronting death. Death comes to a knight upon his arrival from battle and attempts to take him away. The knight challenges Death to a chess match as the people around them are haunted by the plague. The Seventh Seal comes from a riddle about crusaders who arrive home after a few years to find their people affected by the plague. Genres: Drama, Fantasy, Foreign, Indie. Country: Sweden. Runtime: 1h 32m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #133 Blade Runner 1982 Man has made his match... now it's his problem. Director: Ridley Scott. Cast: Harrison Ford, Rutger Hauer, Sean Young, Edward James Olmos, M. Emmet Walsh, Daryl Hannah, William Sanderson, Brion James, Joe Turkel, Joanna Cassidy, James Hong. Overview: In the smog-choked dystopian Los Angeles of 2019, blade runner Rick Deckard is called out of retirement to snuff a quartet of replicants - androids consigned to slave labor on remote planets. They've escaped to Earth seeking their creator and a way to extend their short life spans. Genres: Action, Drama, Film Noir, Science Fiction. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 57m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #134 The Secret in Their Eyes 2009 El Secreto De Sus Ojos Director: Juan José Campanella. Cast: Ricardo Darín, Soledad Villamil, Pablo Rago, Javier Godino, Guillermo Francella. Overview: A man wants to solve a murder committed many years ago. Genres: Crime, Drama, Foreign, Mystery, Romance. Countries: Argentina, Spain. Runtime: 2h 4m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #135 Wild Strawberries 1957 Smultronstället Directors: Gösta Ekman, Ingmar Bergman. Cast: Victor Sjöström, Bibi Andersson, Ingrid Thulin, Gunnar Björnstrand, Jullan Kindahl, Gunnar Sjöberg, Max von Sydow, Åke Fridell, Ann-Marie Wiman. Overview: Professor of medicine Isak Borg travels to Lund University in order to receive his anniversary title. Along the road he meets strangers and relatives, and in his dreams he is confronted with his own past as well as fear of insufficiency. Genres: Drama, Foreign, Indie. Country: Sweden. Runtime: 1h 31m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #136 The General 1927 Directors: Clyde Bruckman, Buster Keaton. Cast: Buster Keaton, Marion Mack, Glen Cavender, Jim Farley, Frederick Vroom, Charles Henry Smith, Frank Barnes, Joe Keaton, Mike Donlin, Tom Nawn. Overview: The General is a 1927 American silent film comedy from Buster Keaton. The film flopped when first released but is now regarded as the height of silent film comedy. The film is based on events from America’s civil war. Genres: Comedy, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 18m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #137 Lock, Stock and Two Smoking Barrels 1998 A Disgrace to Criminals Everywhere. Director: Guy Ritchie. Cast: Jason Flemyng, Dexter Fletcher, Nick Moran, Jason Statham, Steven Mackintosh, Vinnie Jones, Sting, Nicholas Rowe, Nick Marcq, Charles Forbes, Lenny McLean, Peter McNicholl, P.H. Moriarty, Frank Harper, Steve Sweeney. Overview: A fast paced British comedy about four friends who need to make a lot of cash quick after losing a sketchy poker match. Lots of British humor, off the wall characters, and a line up of unbelievable scenes put director Guy Ritchie on the map. Genres: Action, Comedy, Crime, Drama, Foreign, Indie, Thriller. Country: United Kingdom. Runtime: 1h 45m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #138 The Elephant Man 1980 I am not an animal! I am a human being! I...am...a man! Director: David Lynch. Cast: Anthony Hopkins, John Hurt, Anne Bancroft, John Gielgud, Wendy Hiller, Freddie Jones, Michael Elphick, John Standing, Phoebe Nicholls, Kenny Baker. Overview: A Victorian surgeon rescues a heavily disfigured man who is mistreated while scraping a living as a side-show freak. Behind his monstrous facade, there is revealed a person of intelligence and sensitivity. Genre: Drama. Countries: United Kingdom, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 5m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #139 Casino 1995 No one stays at the top forever. Director: Martin Scorsese. Cast: Robert De Niro, Sharon Stone, Joe Pesci, James Woods, Don Rickles, Alan King, Kevin Pollak, Pasquale Cajano, L.Q. Jones, Dick Smothers, Frank Vincent, Oscar Goodman, Richard Riehle, John Bloom, Catherine Scorsese. Overview: Master director Martin Scorsese depicts the sloping depth of a casino mafia boss’ fall. Filmed in a semi-documentary fashion; about the life of the gambling paradise Las Vegas and its dark mafia underbelly. Genres: Drama, Crime. Countries: France, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 58m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #140 The Wolf of Wall Street 2013 EARN. SPEND. PARTY. Director: Martin Scorsese. Cast: Leonardo DiCaprio, Jonah Hill, Matthew McConaughey, Jon Bernthal, Jon Favreau, Cristin Milioti, Kyle Chandler, Ethan Suplee, Spike Jonze, Rob Reiner, Jean Dujardin, Margot Robbie, Shea Whigham, Spike Jonze, Madison McKinley. Overview: A New York stockbroker refuses to cooperate in a large securities fraud case involving corruption on Wall Street, corporate banking world and mob infiltration. Based on Jordan Belfort's autobiography. Genres: Comedy, Crime, Drama. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 59m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #141 Howl's Moving Castle 2004 Director: Hayao Miyazaki. Cast: Chieko Baisho, Takuya Kimura, Akihiro Miwa, Tatsuya Gashuin, Ryunosuke Kamiki, Mitsunori Isaki, Yô Ôizumi, Akio Ôtsuka, Daijiro Harada, Haruko Kato, Jean Simmons, Lauren Bacall, Blythe Danner, Emily Mortimer, Josh Hutcherson. Overview: When Sophie, a shy young woman, is cursed with an old body by a spiteful witch, her only chance of breaking the spell lies with a self-indulgent yet insecure young wizard and his companions in his legged, walking home. Genres: Fantasy, Animation, Science Fiction, Family, Foreign. Country: Japan. Runtime: 2h. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #142 Warrior 2011 Fight for Family Director: Gavin O'Connor. Cast: Tom Hardy, Jennifer Morrison, Nick Nolte, Joel Edgerton, Frank Grillo, Jennifer Morrison, Kevin Dunn, Maximiliano Hernández, Bryan Callen, Sam Sheridan, Jake McLaughlin, Vanessa Martinez, Denzel Whitaker, Carlos Miranda, Nick Lehane. Overview: An ex-Marine haunted by a tragic past, Tommy Riordan (Tom Hardy) returns to his hometown of Pittsburgh and enlists his father (Nick Nolte), a recovering alcoholic and his former coach, to train him for an MMA tournament awarding the biggest purse in the history of the sport. As Tommy blazes a violent path toward the title prize, his brother Brendan (Joel Edgerton), a former MMA fighter unable to make ends meet as a public school teacher, returns to the amateur ring to provide for his family. Even though years have passed, recriminations and past betrayals keep Brendan bitterly estranged from both Tommy and his father. But when Brendan's unlikely rise as an underdog sets him on a collision course with Tommy, the two brothers must finally confront the forces that tore them apart, all the while waging the most intense winner-take-all battle of their lives. Genres: Action, Drama. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 20m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #143 Gran Torino 2008 Ever come across somebody you shouldn't have messed with? Director: Clint Eastwood. Cast: Clint Eastwood, Cory Hardrict, John Carroll Lynch, Geraldine Hughes, Brian Haley, Dreama Walker, Doua Moua, Brian Howe, Sarah Neubauer, Lee Mong Vang, Nana Gbewonyo, Christopher Carley, Bee Vang, John Anton, Austin Douglas Smith. Overview: Walt Kowalski, an iron-willed and inflexible Korean War veteran living in a changing world, is forced by his immigrant neighbors to confront his long-held prejudices. Genres: Action, Adventure, Crime, Drama, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 56m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #144 V for Vendetta 2006 People should not be afraid of their governments. Governments should be afraid of their people. Director: James McTeigue. Cast: Natalie Portman, Hugo Weaving, Stephen Rea, Stephen Fry, John Hurt, Tim Pigott-Smith, Natasha Wightman, Rupert Graves, Roger Allam, Ben Miles, Sinéad Cusack, John Standing, Eddie Marsan, Clive Ashborn, Emma Field-Rayner. Overview: Set against the futuristic landscape of a totalitarian Britain, the movie tells the story of a mild-mannered young woman named Evey who is rescued from a life-and-death situation by a man known only as “V” – a striking figure in a black cloak and a high-peaked hat under which he wears a curious mask. Incomparably charismatic and ferociously skilled in the art of combat and deception, V ignites a revolution when he urges his fellow citizens to rise up against tyranny and oppression. Genres: Action, Drama, Science Fiction, Thriller. Countries: Germany, United Kingdom, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 12m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #145 The Big Lebowski 1998 The Dude abides. Director: Joel Coen. Cast: Jeff Bridges, John Goodman, Steve Buscemi, Julianne Moore, David Huddleston, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Tara Reid, Philip Moon, Mark Pellegrino, Peter Stormare, Flea, Torsten Voges, Jimmie Dale Gilmore, Jack Kehler, John Turturro. Overview: "Dude" Lebowski, mistaken for millionaire Lebowski, seeks restitution for his ruined rug and enlists his bowling buddies to help get it. Genres: Comedy, Crime. Countries: United Kingdom, United States of America. Runtime: 1h 59m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #146 Rebecca 1940 The shadow of this woman darkened their love Director: Alfred Hitchcock. Cast: Laurence Olivier, Joan Fontaine, George Sanders, Judith Anderson, Nigel Bruce, Reginald Denny, Gladys Cooper, Florence Bates, Leo G. Carroll, Leonard Carey, Lumsden Hare, Edward Fielding, Forrester Harvey, Philip Winter, Alfred Hitchcock. Overview: Rebecca is a 1940 psychological/dramatic thriller directed by Alfred Hitchcock as his first American project. It stars Laurence Olivier as Maxim de Winter, Joan Fontaine as his second wife, and Judith Anderson as his late wife's housekeeper, Mrs. Danvers. The film is a gothic tale about the lingering memory of the title character, which still affects Maxim, his new bride, and Mrs. Danvers long after her death. The film won two Academy Awards, including Best Picture out of a total 11 nominations. Olivier, Fontaine and Anderson were all Oscar nominated for their respective roles. Since the introduction of awards for actors in supporting roles, this is the only film named Best Picture that won no other Academy Award for acting, directing or writing. It was the opening film at the 1st Berlin International Film Festival. With excellently played rolls and a story that never seems wrong this film is a true classic. Genres: Drama, Mystery, Romance, Suspense, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 10m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #147 Judgment at Nuremberg 1961 Director: Stanley Kramer. Cast: Spencer Tracy, Burt Lancaster, Richard Widmark, Marlene Dietrich, Maximilian Schell, Judy Garland, Montgomery Clift, Edward Binns, Werner Klemperer, Torben Meyer, Martin Brandt, William Shatner, Kenneth MacKenna, Alan Baxter, John Wengraf. Overview: Judgment at Nuremberg is an American film based on the trials of 4 Nazi judges in Nuremberg Germany in 1948 by an American court. Genres: Drama, History. Countries: Germany, United States of America. Runtime: 3h 6m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #148 A Beautiful Mind 2001 I need to believe that something extra ordinary is possible.... Director: Ron Howard. Cast: Russell Crowe, Ed Harris, Jennifer Connelly, Christopher Plummer, Paul Bettany, Adam Goldberg, Josh Lucas, Anthony Rapp, Jason Gray-Stanford, Judd Hirsch, Austin Pendleton, Vivien Cardone, Jillie Simon, Victor Steinbach, Tanya Clarke. Overview: At Princeton University, John Nash struggles to make a worthwhile contribution to serve as his legacy to the world of mathematics. He finally makes a revolutionary breakthrough that will eventually earn him the Nobel Prize. After graduate school he turns to teaching, becoming romantically involved with his student Alicia. Meanwhile the government asks his help with breaking Soviet codes, which soon gets him involved in a terrifying conspiracy plot. Nash grows more and more paranoid until a discovery that turns his entire world upside down. Now it is only with Alicia's help that he will be able to recover his mental strength and regain his status as the great mathematician we know him as today. Genres: Drama, Romance, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 15m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #149 Cool Hand Luke 1967 The man...and the motion picture that simply do not conform Director: Stuart Rosenberg. Cast: Paul Newman, George Kennedy, Luke Askew, Morgan Woodward, Harry Dean Stanton, Dennis Hopper, Lou Antonio, Robert Drivas, Strother Martin, Jo Van Fleet, Clifton James, Marc Cavell, Richard Davalos, Robert Donner, J.D. Cannon. Overview: Cool Hand Luke is a Drama from director Stuart Rosenberg starring Paul Newman. The film tells the story of a nonconformist rebel named Luke who while in jail tries to break out. Genre: Drama. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 6m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #150 How to Train Your Dragon 2010 We’re lonely, so, let’s be lonely together. Directors: Dean DeBlois, Chris Sanders. Cast: Jay Baruchel, Gerard Butler, Craig Ferguson, America Ferrera, Jonah Hill, Christopher Mintz-Plasse, T.J. Miller, Kristen Wiig, Robin Atkin Downes, Philip McGrade, Kieron Elliott, Ashley Jensen, David Tennant. Overview: As the son of a Viking leader on the cusp of manhood, shy Hiccup Horrendous Haddock III faces a rite of passage: He must kill a dragon to prove his warrior mettle. But after downing a feared dragon, he realizes that he no longer wants to destroy it. So, he befriends the beast -- which he names Toothless -- much to the chagrin of his warrior father Genres: Animation, Family, Adventure, Comedy. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 38m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #151 The Deer Hunter 1978 Winner of 5 Academy Awards including Best Picture 1978 Director: Michael Cimino. Cast: Robert De Niro, John Cazale, John Savage, Christopher Walken, Meryl Streep, George Dzundza, Chuck Aspegren, Shirley Stoler, Rutanya Alda, Pierre Segui, Mady Kaplan, Amy Wright, Mary Ann Haenel, Richard Kuss, Joe Grifasi. Overview: The Deer Hunter is a 1978 war drama film about a trio of Russian American steel worker friends and their infantry service in the Vietnam War. Genres: Drama, War. Countries: United Kingdom, United States of America. Runtime: 3h 2m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #152 Gone with the Wind 1939 Director: Victor Fleming. Cast: Vivien Leigh, Clark Gable, Olivia de Havilland, Thomas Mitchell, Leslie Howard, Barbara O'Neil, Evelyn Keyes, Ann Rutherford, George Reeves, Fred Crane, Hattie McDaniel, Oscar Polk, Butterfly McQueen, Marcella Martin, Harry Davenport. Overview: An American classic in which a manipulative woman and a roguish man carry on a turbulent love affair in the American south during the Civil War and Reconstruction. Genres: Drama, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 3h 39m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #153 Fargo 1996 A lot can happen in the middle of nowhere. Directors: Joel Coen, Ethan Coen. Cast: William H. Macy, Frances McDormand, Steve Buscemi, Peter Stormare, Kristin Rudrüd, Harve Presnell, Tony Denman, Gary Houston, John Carroll Lynch, Sally Wingert, Steve Reevis, Steve Park. Overview: Oscar winning film from the Coen brothers that takes place in the snow covered wasteland of their home-state, Minnesota. A clueless car dealer, Jerry Lundegard, stages the kidnapping of his wife in order to get money from his father-in-law. However, it doesn't take long for his plan to start unravelling. Genres: Comedy, Crime, Drama, Indie. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 38m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #154 Trainspotting 1996 Choose life. Director: Danny Boyle. Cast: Ewan McGregor, Ewen Bremner, Jonny Lee Miller, Kevin McKidd, Kelly Macdonald, Peter Mullan, James Cosmo, Eileen Nicholas, Susan Vidler, Pauline Lynch, Shirley Henderson, Stuart McQuarrie, Irvine Welsh, Robert Carlyle. Overview: Renton is living the dream and that dream is Heroin. As Renton struggles with the agony and ecstasy of his life we follow him and his increasingly unstable mates. Drinking, fighting, drugs, sex and the most disgusting toilet in Scotland. Choose Trainspotting. Genres: Drama, Comedy, Foreign. Country: United Kingdom. Runtime: 1h 34m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #155 It Happened One Night 1934 Director: Frank Capra. Cast: Clark Gable, Claudette Colbert, Walter Connolly, Roscoe Karns, Jameson Thomas, Alan Hale, Arthur Hoyt, Blanche Friderici, Charles C. Wilson. Overview: Comic romance between a down-to-earth newspaper reporter and a spoiled runaway heiress. Genres: Comedy, Drama, Road Movie, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 45m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #156 Dial M For Murder 1954 Director: Alfred Hitchcock. Cast: Ray Milland, Grace Kelly, Robert Cummings, John Williams, Anthony Dawson. Overview: Inspector Hubbard has to explain an extremely tricky case of keeping Mrs. Margot Wendice from capital punishment. Hitchcock has created with this film an almost perfect Murder, and made Grace Kelly famous. Genres: Crime, Drama, Mystery, Romance, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 44m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #157 Into the Wild 2007 Your great adventure on Alaska. Director: Sean Penn. Cast: Emile Hirsch, Marcia Gay Harden, William Hurt, Jena Malone, Brian H. Dierker, Catherine Keener, Vince Vaughn, Hal Holbrook, Thure Lindhardt, Signe Egholm Olsen, Cheryl Francis Harrington, Kristen Stewart. Overview: Based on a true story. After graduating from Emory University in 1992, top student and athlete Christopher McCandless abandoned his possessions, gave his entire $24,000 savings account to charity and hitchhiked to Alaska to live in the wilderness. Along the way, Christopher encounters a series of characters who shape his life. Genres: Action, Adventure, Drama. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 28m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #158 Gone Girl 2014 You don't know what you've got 'til it's... Director: David Fincher. Cast: Ben Affleck, Rosamund Pike, Tyler Perry, Neil Patrick Harris, Missi Pyle, Patrick Fugit, Kim Dickens, Casey Wilson, Kathleen Rose Perkins, Emily Ratajkowski, Scoot McNairy, Boyd Holbrook, Lola Kirke, Carrie Coon. Overview: With his wife's disappearance having become the focus of an intense media circus, a man sees the spotlight turned on him when it's suspected that he may not be innocent. Genres: Drama, Mystery, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 29m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #159 The Sixth Sense 1999 I see dead people Director: M. Night Shyamalan. Cast: Bruce Willis, Haley Joel Osment, Toni Collette, Olivia Williams, Mischa Barton, Donnie Wahlberg, Trevor Morgan, Greg Wood, Jeffrey Zubernis, Glenn Fitzgerald, Bruce Norris. Overview: A psychological thriller about an eight year old boy named Cole Sear who believes he can see into the world of the dead. A child psychologist named Malcolm Crowe comes to Cole to help him deal with his problem, learning that he really can see ghosts of dead people. Genres: Drama, Horror, Suspense, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 47m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #160 Rush 2013 Everyone's driven by something. Director: Ron Howard. Cast: Daniel Brühl, Chris Hemsworth, Olivia Wilde, Alexandra Maria Lara, Natalie Dormer, Christian McKay, Tom Wlaschiha. Overview: A biography of Formula 1 champion driver Niki Lauda and the 1976 crash that almost claimed his life. Mere weeks after the accident, he got behind the wheel to challenge his rival, James Hunt. Genres: Action, Drama, Sports Film. Countries: United Kingdom, Germany, United States of America. Runtime: 2h 3m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #161 Finding Nemo 2003 There are 3.7 trillion fish in the ocean, they're looking for one. Directors: Andrew Stanton, Lee Unkrich. Cast: Alexander Gould, Albert Brooks, Ellen DeGeneres, Brad Garrett, Allison Janney, Andrew Stanton, Elizabeth Perkins, Barry Humphries, Bill Hunter, Willem Dafoe. Overview: A tale which follows the comedic and eventful journeys of two fish, the fretful Marlin and his young son Nemo, who are separated from each other in the Great Barrier Reef when Nemo is unexpectedly taken from his home and thrust into a fish tank in a dentist's office overlooking Sydney Harbor. Buoyed by the companionship of a friendly but forgetful fish named Dory, the overly cautious Marlin embarks on a dangerous trek and finds himself the unlikely hero of an epic journey to rescue his son. Genres: Animation, Family, Comedy. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 40m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #162 The Maltese Falcon 1941 A story as EXPLOSIVE as his BLAZING automatics! Director: John Huston. Cast: Humphrey Bogart, Peter Lorre, Mary Astor, Gladys George, Barton MacLane, Lee Patrick, Sydney Greenstreet, Ward Bond, Jerome Cowan, Elisha Cook, Jr., James Burke, Murray Alper, John Hamilton. Overview: The Maltese Falcon is a mystery thriller detective film from John Huston starring Humphrey Bogart. The film is regarded as a landmark in the film-noir movement. Genres: Crime, Drama, Thriller, Film Noir. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 40m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #163 Mary and Max 2009 Director: Adam Elliot. Cast: Toni Collette, Philip Seymour Hoffman, Eric Bana, Barry Humphries, Bethany Whitmore, Renée Geyer. Overview: A tale of friendship between two unlikely pen pals: Mary, a lonely, eight-year-old girl living in the suburbs of Melbourne, and Max, a forty-four-year old, severely obese man living in New York.In the mid-1970's, a homely, friendless Australian girl of 8 picks a name out of a Manhattan phone book and writes to him; she includes a chocolate bar. She's Mary Dinkle, the only child of an alcoholic mother and a distracted father. He's Max Horowitz, living alone in New York, overweight, subject to anxiety attacks. He writes back, with chocolate. Thus begins a 20-year correspondence, interrupted by a stay in an asylum and a few misunderstandings. Mary falls in love with a neighbor, saves money to have a birthmark removed and deals with loss. Max has a friendship with a neighbor, tries to control his weight, and finally gets the dream job. Will the two ever meet face to face? Genres: Animation, Comedy, Drama, Foreign, Indie. Country: Australia. Runtime: 1h 20m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #164 No Country for Old Men 2007 There are no clean getaways. Directors: Ethan Coen, Joel Coen. Cast: Tommy Lee Jones, Javier Bardem, Josh Brolin, Woody Harrelson, Kelly Macdonald, Garret Dillahunt, Tess Harper, Barry Corbin, Stephen Root, Rodger Boyce, Beth Grant, Ana Reeder, Kit Gwin, Zach Hopkins. Overview: Llewelyn Moss stumbles upon dead bodies, $2 million and a hoard of heroin in a Texas desert, but methodical killer Anton Chigurh comes looking for it, with local sheriff Ed Tom Bell hot on his trail. The roles of prey and predator blur as violent pursuits of money and justice collide. Genres: Crime, Drama, Mystery, Suspense, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 2m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #165 The Thing 1982 Director: John Carpenter. Cast: Kurt Russell, Wilford Brimley, T.K. Carter, David Clennon, Keith David, Richard Dysart, Charles Hallahan, Peter Maloney, Richard Masur, Donald Moffat, Joel Polis, Thomas G. Waites. Overview: Scientists in the Antarctic are confronted by a shape-shifting alien that assumes the appearance of the people that it kills. Genres: Horror, Science Fiction, Thriller. Countries: Canada, United States of America. Runtime: 1h 49m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #166 Incendies 2010 The search began at the opening of their mother's will. Director: Denis Villeneuve. Cast: Lubna Azabal, Mélissa Désormeaux-Poulin, Maxim Gaudette, Rémy Girard. Overview: A mother's last wishes send twins Jeanne and Simon on a journey to Middle East in search of their tangled roots. Adapted from Wajdi Mouawad's acclaimed play, Incendies tells the powerful and moving tale of two young adults' voyage to the core of deep-rooted hatred, never-ending wars and enduring love. Genres: Drama, Mystery, War. Countries: Canada, France. Runtime: 2h 10m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #167 Hotel Rwanda 2004 When the world closed its eyes, he opened his arms. Director: Terry George. Cast: Don Cheadle, Nick Nolte, Sophie Okonedo, Joaquin Phoenix, Jean Reno, Ofentse Modiselle, Mathabo Pieterson, Neil McCarthy, Desmond Dube, Hakeem Kae-Kazim, Tony Kgoroge, Fana Mokoena, Lebo Mashile, Antonio David Lyons, Leleti Khumalo. Overview: Inspired by true events this film takes place in Rwanda in the 1990’s when more than a million Tutsis’ were killed in a Genocide that went mostly unnoticed by the rest of the world. Hotel owner Paul Rusesabagina houses over a thousand refuges in his hotel in attempt to save their lives. Genres: Drama, Foreign, History. Countries: United Kingdom, Italy, United States of America, South Africa. Runtime: 2h 1m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #168 Kill Bill Vol. 1 2003 Go for the kill Director: Quentin Tarantino. Cast: Uma Thurman, Lucy Liu, David Carradine, Michael Madsen, Daryl Hannah, Vivica A. Fox, Michael Parks, Chiaki Kuriyama, Sonny Chiba, Julie Dreyfus, Jun Kunimura, Kazuki Kitamura, Akaji Maro, Chia Hui Liu, Ambrosia Kelley. Overview: An assassin is shot at the altar by her ruthless employer, Bill, and other members of their assassination circle. But "The Bride" lives to plot her vengeance. Setting out for some payback, she makes a death list and hunts down those who wronged her, saving Bill for last. Genres: Action, Crime, Thriller. Countries: Japan, United States of America. Runtime: 1h 51m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #169 Life of Brian 1979 He wasn't the messiah. He was a very naughty boy. Director: Terry Jones. Cast: Graham Chapman, John Cleese, Terry Gilliam, Eric Idle, Terry Jones, Michael Palin, Terence Bayler, Carol Cleveland, Kenneth Colley, Neil Innes, Charles McKeown, John Young, Gwen Taylor, Sue Jones-Davies, John Case. Overview: A brilliant parody from the British comedy group Monty Python about the history of (not Jesus but the boy born right next door to The Manger, Brian). A Terry Jones directed film from 1979 that has since gained cult status. What many fans don't know is that this movie might never have happened if not for the financial assistance of George Harrison (of The Beatles). Genre: Comedy. Country: United Kingdom. Runtime: 1h 34m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #170 Platoon 1986 The first casualty of war is innocence. Director: Oliver Stone. Cast: Charlie Sheen, Willem Dafoe, Forest Whitaker, Kevin Dillon, John C. McGinley, Francesco Quinn, Richard Edson, Reggie Johnson, Keith David, David Neidorf, Mark Moses, Chris Pedersen, Ivan Kane, Paul Sanchez, J. Adam Glover. Overview: A young recruit in Vietnam faces a moral crisis when confronted with the horrors of war and the duality of man. Genres: Action, Drama, War. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #171 The Wages of Fear 1953 Le salaire de la peur Director: Henri-Georges Clouzot. Cast: Yves Montand, Charles Vanel, Peter van Eyck, Folco Lulli, Véra Clouzot, Antonio Centa, Luis De Lima, Jo Dest, Darío Moreno, William Tubbs. Overview: The Wages of Fear / Le Salaire de la Peur – is a black and white French classic by Clouzot about a South American village in the 1950’s where men who are paid to transporting extremely dangerous nitroglycerine. The story is about the rivalry that grows between the two groups of drivers. An art road genre movie. Genres: Adventure, Drama, Foreign, Road Movie, Thriller. Countries: France, Italy. Runtime: 2h 30m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #172 Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid 1969 Not that it matters, but most of it is true. Director: George Roy Hill. Cast: Paul Newman, Robert Redford, Katharine Ross, Strother Martin, Henry Jones, Jeff Corey, George Furth, Cloris Leachman, Ted Cassidy, Kenneth Mars, Donnelly Rhodes, Kelly Williams. Overview: Butch Cassidy and the Sundance Kid is a western comedy from 1969 starring Paul Newman and Robert Redford, two robbers with one more job to finish. The film was biggest box-office hit of the 60’s. Genres: Action, Adventure, Comedy, Drama, Western. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 50m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #173 There Will Be Blood 2007 There Will Be Greed. There Will Be Vengeance. Director: Paul Thomas Anderson. Cast: Daniel Day-Lewis, Paul Dano, Dillon Freasier, Ciarán Hinds, Kevin J. O'Connor, Hope Elizabeth Reeves, Colleen Foy, Barry Del Sherman, David Willis, Hans Howes, Sydney McCallister. Overview: When Daniel Plainview - a ruthless oil prospector - learns of oil-rich land in California that can be bought cheaply, he moves his operation there and begins manipulating and exploiting the local landowners into selling him their property. Using his young adopted son H.W. to project the image of a caring family man, Plainview gains the cooperation of almost all the locals with lofty promises to build schools and cultivate the land to make their community flourish. Over time, Plainview's gradual accumulation of wealth and power causes his true self to surface, and he begins to slowly alienate himself from everyone in his life. Genres: Drama, Indie, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 38m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #174 Network 1976 Not since the dawn of time has America experienced a man like Howard Beale! Director: Sidney Lumet. Cast: Faye Dunaway, William Holden, Peter Finch, Robert Duvall, Wesley Addy, Ned Beatty, Arthur Burghardt, Conchata Ferrell. Overview: Not since the dawn of time has America experienced a man like Howard Beale! Genres: Comedy, Drama, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 1m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #175 Touch of Evil 1958 THE STRANGEST VENGEANCE EVER PLANNED! Director: Orson Welles. Cast: Charlton Heston, Janet Leigh, Orson Welles, Joseph Calleia, Akim Tamiroff, Joanna Moore, Ray Collins, Dennis Weaver, Valentin de Vargas, Mort Mills, Victor Millan, Lalo Rios, Michael Sargent, Phil Harvey, Joi Lansing. Overview: Stark, perverse story of murder, kidnapping, and police corruption in Mexican border town. Genres: Crime, Film Noir, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 46m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #176 The 400 Blows 1959 Les quatre cent coups Angel faces hell-bent for violence. Director: François Truffaut. Cast: Jean-Pierre Léaud, Claire Maurier, Albert Rémy, Georges Flamant, Patrick Auffay, Robert Beauvais, Yvonne Claudie, Pierre Repp, Guy Decomble. Overview: Intensely touching story of a misunderstood young adolescent who left without attention, delves into a life of petty crime. Genres: Drama, Foreign, Indie. Country: France. Runtime: 1h 39m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #177 Stand by Me 1986 Director: Rob Reiner. Cast: Wil Wheaton, River Phoenix, Corey Feldman, Jerry O'Connell, Kiefer Sutherland, John Cusack, Richard Dreyfuss, Casey Siemaszko, Gary Riley, Bradley Gregg, Jason Oliver, Marshall Bell, Frances Lee McCain, Bruce Kirby, William Bronder. Overview: The film's name comes from the song "Stand By Me" by Ben E. King from 1961. The song was also the theme song. This film was modeled from a novella by Stephen King called "The Body" and was the first filmed story from the author. The film tells the story of a group of 10-year-old friends out on their own and the trials and tribulation they are confronted with along the journey. Genres: Crime, Drama. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 25m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #178 12 Years a Slave 2013 Director: Steve McQueen. Cast: Michael Fassbender, Brad Pitt, Chiwetel Ejiofor, Michael K. Williams, Paul Dano, Benedict Cumberbatch, Garret Dillahunt, Ruth Negga, Sarah Paulson, Scoot McNairy, Paul Giamatti, Taran Killam, Alfre Woodard. Overview: A man living in New York during the mid-1800s is kidnapped and sold into slavery in the deep south. Genres: Drama, History. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 13m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #179 The Princess Bride 1987 She gets kidnapped. He gets killed. But it all ends up okay. Director: Rob Reiner. Cast: Peter Falk, Cary Elwes, Robin Wright, Chris Sarandon, Wallace Shawn, Mandy Patinkin, André the Giant, Billy Crystal, Carol Kane, Fred Savage, Christopher Guest, Mel Smith. Overview: In this enchantingly cracked fairy tale, the beautiful Princess Buttercup and the dashing Westley must overcome staggering odds to find happiness amid six-fingered swordsmen, murderous princes, Sicilians and rodents of unusual size. But even death can't stop these true lovebirds from triumphing. Genres: Action, Adventure, Comedy, Family, Fantasy, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 38m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #180 Annie Hall 1977 A nervous romance. Director: Woody Allen. Cast: Woody Allen, Diane Keaton, Tony Roberts, Carol Kane, Paul Simon, Shelley Duvall, Janet Margolin, Colleen Dewhurst, Christopher Walken, Donald Symington, Helen Ludlam, Mordecai Lawner, Joan Neuman, Jonathan Munk, Dick Cavett. Overview: The neurotic New Yorker Woody Allen tells one of the greatest romantic comedies to be set in the city of New York. Genres: Comedy, Drama, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 33m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #181 Persona 1966 Director: Ingmar Bergman. Cast: Bibi Andersson, Liv Ullmann, Margaretha Krook, Gunnar Björnstrand, Jörgen Lindström. Overview: Persona is a psychoanalytical film from Swedish director Ingmar Bergman and reputed as his greatest masterpiece. The film deals with a silent actress and her relationship with her nurse who narrates her story. Genres: Drama, Foreign. Country: Sweden. Runtime: 1h 25m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #182 The Grand Budapest Hotel 2014 Director: Wes Anderson. Cast: Ralph Fiennes, Tony Revolori, F. Murray Abraham, Mathieu Amalric, Adrien Brody, Willem Dafoe, Jeff Goldblum, Harvey Keitel, Jude Law, Bill Murray, Edward Norton, Saoirse Ronan, Jason Schwartzman, Léa Seydoux, Tilda Swinton. Overview: The Grand Budapest Hotel tells of a legendary concierge at a famous European hotel between the wars and his friendship with a young employee who becomes his trusted protégé. The story involves the theft and recovery of a priceless Renaissance painting, the battle for an enormous family fortune and the slow and then sudden upheavals that transformed Europe during the first half of the 20th century. Genres: Comedy, Drama. Countries: Germany, United Kingdom, United States of America. Runtime: 1h 39m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #183 Amores perros 2000 Love. Betrayal. Death. Director: Alejandro González Iñárritu. Cast: Gael García Bernal, Vanessa Bauche, Goya Toledo, Alvaro Guerrero, Emilio Echevarría, Jorge Salinas, Rodrigo Murray, Humberto Busto, Gerardo Campbell, Rosa María Bianchi, Dunia Saldívar, Adriana Barraza, José Sefami, Lourdes Echevarría, Marco Pérez. Overview: In Mexico City the lives and stories of three people become tied up in an intense Oscar winning film. Valeria and El Chivo have one thing in common: their souls stimulate them towards a relationship with their dogs. Amores Perros is the first film in Iñárritu's "Death Trilogy". Genres: Drama, Foreign, Indie, Thriller. Country: Mexico. Runtime: 2h 33m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #184 In the Name of the Father 1993 Director: Jim Sheridan. Cast: Daniel Day-Lewis, Emma Thompson, Pete Postlethwaite, John Lynch, Beatie Edney, Mark Sheppard. Overview: A small time thief from Belfast, Gerry Conlon, is falsely implicated in the IRA bombing of a pub that kills several people while he is in London. He and his four friends are coerced by British police into confessing their guilt. Gerry's father and other relatives in London are also implicated in the crime. He spends fifteen years in prison with his father trying to prove his innocence. Genres: Drama, Foreign. Countries: United Kingdom, Ireland. Runtime: 2h 8m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #185 Million Dollar Baby 2004 Beyond his silence, there is a past. Beyond her dreams, there is a feeling. Beyond hope, there is a memory. Beyond their journey, there is a love. Director: Clint Eastwood. Cast: Clint Eastwood, Hilary Swank, Morgan Freeman, Jay Baruchel, Mike Colter, Brían F. O'Byrne, Lucia Rijker, Anthony Mackie, Margo Martindale, Riki Lindhome, Michael Peña. Overview: Despondent over a painful estrangement from his daughter, trainer Frankie Dunn isn't prepared for boxer Maggie Fitzgerald to enter his life. But Maggie's determined to go pro -- and to convince Dunn and his cohort to help her. Genres: Drama, Sports Film. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 17m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #186 Ben-Hur 1959 The entertainment experience of a lifetime. Director: William Wyler. Cast: Charlton Heston, Jack Hawkins, Haya Harareet, Stephen Boyd, Hugh Griffith, Martha Scott, Cathy O'Donnell, Frank Thring, Sam Jaffe, Ady Berber, Finlay Currie, George Relph, André Morell. Overview: Ben-Hur is a 1959 epic film directed by William Wyler, the third film version of Lew Wallace's 1880 novel Ben-Hur: A Tale of the Christ. It premiered at Loew's State Theatre in New York City on November 18, 1959. The film went on to win a record of eleven Academy Awards, including Best Picture, a feat equaled only by Titanic in 1998 and The Lord of the Rings: The Return of the King in 2004. It was also the last film to win the Oscar for both Best Actor and Best Supporting Actor, until nearly 44 years later when Mystic River achieved the same feat.The movie revolves around a Jewish prince who is betrayed and sent into slavery by a Roman friend and how he regains his freedom and comes back for revenge. Genres: Adventure, Drama, History. Country: Italy. Runtime: 3h 32m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #187 The Grapes of Wrath 1940 Directors: John Ford, Edward O'Fearna. Cast: Henry Fonda, Jane Darwell, John Carradine, Charley Grapewin, Dorris Bowdon, Russell Simpson, O.Z. Whitehead, John Qualen, Eddie Quillan, Zeffie Tilbury. Overview: The Grapes of Wrath is a social drama filmed in 1939 based on the novel by the same name from acclaimed author John Steinbeck. Genres: Drama, Road Movie. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 8m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #188 Hachi: A Dog's Tale 2009 Director: Lasse Hallström. Cast: Richard Gere, Joan Allen, Jason Alexander, Cary-Hiroyuki Tagawa. Overview: A drama based on the true story of a college professor's bond with the abandoned dog he takes into his home. Genres: Drama, Family. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 33m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #189 Nausicaä of the Valley of the Wind 1984 Kaze no tani no Naushika Director: Hayao Miyazaki. Cast: Sumi Shimamoto, Mahito Tsujimura, Hisako Kyôda, Gorô Naya, Ichirô Nagai, Kôhei Miyauchi, Jôji Yanami, Minoru Yada, Rihoko Yoshida, Yôji Matsuda, Mîna Tominaga, Yoshiko Sakakibara, Iemasa Kayumi, Tetsuo Mizutori, Uma Thurman. Overview: Nausicaä, a gentle young princess, has an empathetic bond with the giant mutated insects that evolved in the wake of the destruction of the ecosystem. Traveling by cumbersome flying ship, on the backs of giant birds, and perched atop her beloved glider, Nausicaä and her allies must negotiate peace between kingdoms battling over the last of the world's precious natural resources. Genres: Adventure, Fantasy, Animation, Action, Science Fiction, Foreign. Country: Japan. Runtime: 1h 35m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #190 Shutter Island 2010 Someone is missing. Director: Martin Scorsese. Cast: Leonardo DiCaprio, Mark Ruffalo, Ben Kingsley, Emily Mortimer, Michelle Williams, Max von Sydow, Jackie Earle Haley, Patricia Clarkson, Ted Levine, John Carroll Lynch, Elias Koteas, Robin Bartlett, Christopher Denham, Spencer Treat Clark, Charlie Hewson. Overview: Drama is set in 1954, U.S. Marshal Teddy Daniels is investigating the disappearance of a murderess who escaped from a hospital for the criminally insane and is presumed to be hiding on the remote Shutter Island. Genres: Drama, Mystery, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 18m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #191 Diabolique 1955 Les Diaboliques Director: Henri-Georges Clouzot. Cast: Simone Signoret, Véra Clouzot, Paul Meurisse, Charles Vanel, Jean Brochard, Pierre Larquey, Michel Serrault, Thérèse Dorny, Noël Roquevert, Yves-Marie Maurin, Georges Poujouly, Georges Chamarat, Jacques Varennes. Overview: Les Diaboliques is a mystery thriller from French director Henri-Georges Clouzot about a triangle relationship that leads to murder.The wife of a cruel headmaster and his mistress conspire to kill him, but after the murder is committed his body disappears, and strange events begin to plague the two women. Genres: Foreign, Horror, Thriller. Country: France. Runtime: 1h 47m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #192 Sin City 2005 There is no justice without sin. Directors: Frank Miller, Robert Rodriguez, Quentin Tarantino. Cast: Bruce Willis, Mickey Rourke, Clive Owen, Jessica Alba, Elijah Wood, Josh Hartnett, Jaime King, Rutger Hauer, Benicio Del Toro, Rosario Dawson, Michael Clarke Duncan, Devon Aoki, Alexis Bledel, Powers Boothe, Marley Shelton. Overview: The first of three films based on the beautiful comic world of Frank Miller. Sin City depicts the comic book almost page for page with its heavy contrast black and white extremely violent and graphic imagery. Sin City is set in a dangerous and dark Basin City where corruption, sex and violence is everyday life. Genres: Action, Crime, Drama, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 4m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #193 The Wizard of Oz 1939 We're off to see the Wizard, the wonderful Wizard of Oz! Directors: King Vidor, Mervyn LeRoy, George Cukor, Victor Fleming. Cast: Judy Garland, Frank Morgan, Ray Bolger, Bert Lahr, Jack Haley Sr., Billie Burke, Margaret Hamilton, Charley Grapewin, Clara Blandick, Charles Becker, Meinhardt Raabe, Frank Morgan, Frank Morgan, Frank Morgan, Frank Morgan. Overview: One of the most famous musical films and the first film from Hollywood to use color. Young Dorothy finds herself in a magical world where she makes friends with a lion, a scarecrow and a tin man as they make their way along the yellow brick road to talk with the Wizard and ask for the things they miss most in their lives. The Wicked Witch of the West is the only thing that could stop them. Genres: Adventure, Family, Fantasy, Musical, Science Fiction. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 41m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #194 Gandhi 1982 Director: Richard Attenborough. Cast: Ben Kingsley, Rohini Hattangadi, Candice Bergen, Roshan Seth, Om Puri, Saeed Jaffrey, Alyque Padamsee, Martin Sheen, Amrish Puri, Ian Charleson, Edward Fox, Geraldine James, Daniel Day-Lewis, John Gielgud, Trevor Howard. Overview: Director Richard Attenborough tells with this epic, and elaborate produced film, the story of freedom and peace fighter Gandhi, the Indian who helped give Indians their independence. The film was nominated in eleven categories at the Academy Awards, winning eight in total. Genres: Drama, Foreign, History. Countries: United Kingdom, India. Runtime: 3h 8m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #195 The Bourne Ultimatum 2007 Remember everything. Forgive nothing. Director: Paul Greengrass. Cast: Matt Damon, Joan Allen, Paddy Considine, Julia Stiles, David Strathairn, Édgar Ramírez, Corey Johnson, Scott Glenn, Albert Finney, Tom Gallop, Daniel Brühl, Joey Ansah, Colin Stinton. Overview: Bourne is brought out of hiding once again by reporter Simon Ross who is trying to unveil Operation Blackbriar, an upgrade to Project Treadstone, in a series of newspaper columns. Information from the reporter stirs a new set of memories, and Bourne must finally uncover his dark past while dodging The Company's best efforts to eradicate him. Genres: Action, Drama, Mystery, Thriller. Countries: United States of America, Germany. Runtime: 1h 55m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #196 Сталкер 1979 Director: Andrei Tarkovsky. Cast: Aleksandr Kaidanovsky, Alisa Frejndlikh, Anatoli Solonitsyn, Nikolai Grinko, Natasha Abramova. Overview: Near a gray and unnamed city is the Zone, an alien place guarded by barbed wire and soldiers. Over his wife's numerous objections, a man rises in the dead of night: he's a stalker, one of a handful who have the mental gifts (and who risk imprisonment) to lead people into the Zone to the Room, a place where one's secret hopes come true. Genres: Drama, Foreign, Horror, Science Fiction, Thriller. Country: Russian Federation. Runtime: 2h 43m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #197 The Best Years of Our Lives 1946 Director: William Wyler. Cast: Fredric March, Myrna Loy, Dana Andrews, Teresa Wright, Virginia Mayo, Cathy O'Donnell, Hoagy Carmichael, Harold Russell, Gladys George, Roman Bohnen, Ray Collins, Minna Gombell, Walter Baldwin, Steve Cochran, Dorothy Adams. Overview: The Best Years of Our Lives is a classic film from director Williams Wyler about three war veterans. The film earned seven Oscars in 1946. Genres: Drama, History. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 52m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #198 Donnie Darko 2001 You can never go too far. Director: Richard Kelly. Cast: Jake Gyllenhaal, Patrick Swayze, Drew Barrymore, Maggie Gyllenhaal, Holmes Osborne, Daveigh Chase, Mary McDonnell, James Duval, Arthur Taxier, Mark Hoffman, Patience Cleveland, David St. James, Jazzie Mahannah, Jolene Purdy, Beth Grant. Overview: A troubled teenager is plagued by visions of a large bunny rabbit that manipulates him to commit a series of crimes, after narrowly escaping a bizarre accident. Genres: Drama, Thriller, Science Fiction, Mystery. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 53m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #199 Wild Tales 2014 Relatos salvajes Director: Damián Szifrón. Cast: Ricardo Darín, Leonardo Sbaraglia, Darío Grandinetti, Erica Rivas, Erica Rivas, Nancy Dupláa, María Onetto , María Onetto , Rita Cortese, Rita Cortese. Overview: A story about love deception, the return of the past, a tragedy, or even the violence contained in an everyday detail, appear themselves to push them towards the abyss, into the undeniable pleasure of losing control. Genres: Comedy, Drama, Thriller. Countries: Argentina, Spain. Runtime: 2h 5m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #200 Strangers on a Train 1951 Director: Alfred Hitchcock. Cast: Farley Granger, Ruth Roman, Robert Walker, Leo G. Carroll, Patricia Hitchcock, Norma Varden, Marion Lorne, Jonathan Hale, Howard St. John, John Brown, Robert Gist, Kasey Rogers. Overview: Strangers on a Train is a typical Hitchcock thriller with all the elements of a suspense film masterpiece: The innocent man is being chased for a crime he didn’t do. Genres: Crime, Drama, Mystery, Suspense, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 41m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #201 8½ 1963 Eight and a Half Director: Federico Fellini. Cast: Marcello Mastroianni, Claudia Cardinale, Anouk Aimée, Sandra Milo, Rossella Falk, Barbara Steele, Madeleine Lebeau, Caterina Boratto, Eddra Gale, Guido Alberti. Overview: With 8 ½ Frederico Fellini leaves a self-portrait where dreams and reality are a mix. With help from a most excellent cast and unique scenery this self reflecting film is one of his master works. Genres: Drama, Fantasy. Countries: France, Italy. Runtime: 2h 18m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #202 Jurassic Park 1993 An adventure 65 million years in the making. Director: Steven Spielberg. Cast: Sam Neill, Laura Dern, Jeff Goldblum, Richard Attenborough, Joseph Mazzello, Ariana Richards, Bob Peck, Samuel L. Jackson, Martin Ferrero, Wayne Knight, Greg Burson. Overview: A wealthy entrepreneur secretly creates a theme park featuring living dinosaurs drawn from prehistoric DNA. Before opening day, he invites a team of experts and his two eager grandchildren to experience the park and help calm anxious investors. However, the park is anything but amusing as the security systems go off-line and the dinosaurs escape. Genres: Action, Adventure, Drama, Science Fiction, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 7m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #203 The Avengers 2012 Some assembly required. Director: Joss Whedon. Cast: Chris Evans, Chris Hemsworth, Mark Ruffalo, Jeremy Renner, Scarlett Johansson, Tom Hiddleston, Samuel L. Jackson, Cobie Smulders, Clark Gregg, Gwyneth Paltrow, Stellan Skarsgård, Paul Bettany, Lou Ferrigno, Jenny Agutter, Walter Perez. Overview: When an unexpected enemy emerges that threatens global safety and security, Nick Fury, Director of the international peacekeeping agency known as S.H.I.E.L.D., finds himself in need of a team to pull the world back from the brink of disaster. Spanning the globe, a daring recruitment effort begins. Genres: Action, Adventure, Science Fiction. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 15m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #204 Before Sunrise 1995 Can the greatest moment of your life last only one night? Director: Richard Linklater. Cast: Ethan Hawke, Julie Delpy, Andrea Eckert, Hanno Pöschl, Karl Bruckschwaiger, Tex Rubinowitz, Ernie Mangold, Hans Weingartner, Dominik Castell, Bilge Jeschim, Harold Waiglein, Haymon Maria Buttinger, Kurti. Overview: A dialogue marathon of a film, this fairy tail love story of an American boy and French girl. During a day and a night together in Vienna their two hearts collide. Genres: Comedy, Drama, Romance. Countries: Austria, Switzerland, United States of America. Runtime: 1h 45m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #205 12 Monkeys 1995 The future is history Director: Terry Gilliam. Cast: Bruce Willis, Brad Pitt, Madeleine Stowe, Christopher Plummer, David Morse, Frank Gorshin, Frederick Strother, Jon Seda. Overview: In the year 2035, convict James Cole volunteers reluctantly to be sent back in time by scientists to discover the origin of a deadly virus that wiped out nearly all of the earth's population decades earlier. But when Cole is sent mistakenly to 1990 instead of 1996, he's arrested and locked up in a mental hospital, where he meets a psychiatrist and the son of a famous virus expert. Genres: Science Fiction, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 10m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #206 The Terminator 1984 Your future is in his hands. Director: James Cameron. Cast: Arnold Schwarzenegger, Michael Biehn, Linda Hamilton, Paul Winfield, Lance Henriksen, Bess Motta, Earl Boen, Rick Rossovich, Bill Paxton, Brian Thompson, Franco Columbu, Dick Miller. Overview: In the post-apocalyptic future, reigning tyrannical supercomputers teleport a cyborg assassin known as the "Terminator" back to 1984 to snuff Sarah Connor, whose unborn son is destined to lead insurgents against 21st century mechanical hegemony. Meanwhile, the human-resistance movement dispatches a lone warrior to safeguard Sarah. Can he stop the virtually indestructible killing machine? Genres: Action, Adventure, Science Fiction, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 48m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #207 Infernal Affairs 2002 Loyalty. Honor. Betrayal. Directors: Wai-keung Lau, Alan Mak. Cast: Anthony Wong Chau-Sang, Eric Tsang, Andy Lau, Shawn Yue, Edison Chen, Kelly Chen, Sammy Cheng, Elva Hsiao, Chapman To, Lam Ka-tung, Dion Lam, Tony Leung Chiu Wai. Overview: Chan Wing Yan, a young police officer, has been sent undercover as a mole in the local mafia. Lau Kin Ming, a young mafia member, infiltrates the police force. Years later, their older counterparts, Chen Wing Yan and Inspector Lau Kin Ming, respectively, race against time to expose the mole within their midst. Genres: Crime, Drama, Thriller. Country: Hong Kong. Runtime: 1h 41m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #208 Jaws 1975 Don’t go in the water. Director: Steven Spielberg. Cast: Roy Scheider, Robert Shaw, Richard Dreyfuss, Lorraine Gary, Murray Hamilton, Carl Gottlieb, Jeffrey Kramer, Susan Backlinie, Jonathan Filley, Chris Rebello, Jay Mello, Lee Fierro, Jeffrey Voorhees, Craig Kingsbury, Dr. Robert Nevin. Overview: An insatiable great white shark terrorizes the townspeople of Amity Island, The police chief, an oceanographer and a grizzled shark hunter seek to destroy the bloodthirsty beast. Genres: Thriller, Horror. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 4m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #209 Groundhog Day 1993 He's having the worst day of his life... over, and over... Director: Harold Ramis. Cast: Bill Murray, Andie MacDowell, Chris Elliott, Stephen Tobolowsky, Brian Doyle-Murray, Marita Geraghty, Angela Paton, Rick Ducommun, Rick Overton, Robin Duke, Carol Bivins, Willie Garson, Scooter, Ken Hudson Campbell. Overview: A comedy about an egocentric and sinister television weather reporter with a bad case of Deja-Vu. The weather reporter, Bill Murray, is sent to the famous Groundhog Day tradition in the small town of Punxsutawney were he unwillingly has to report on a little more than he expected. Let's just say he had to do a few retakes of the report. Genres: Fantasy, Comedy, Science Fiction, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 41m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #210 Memories of Murder 2003 Salinui chueok Director: Joon-ho Bong. Cast: Kang-ho Song, Sang-kyung Kim, Roe-ha Kim, Jae-ho Song. Overview: Based on the true story of the country's first known serial murders, which took place between 1986 and 1991 in Hwaseong, Gyeonggi Province, the movie begins with a series of raped and murdered women. Two bumbling, incompetent local detectives realizes a serial killer is on the loose and begins to chase after the murderer. Genres: Crime, Drama, Foreign, Thriller. Country: Korea. Runtime: 2h 7m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #211 The Battle of Algiers 1967 La battaglia di Algeri Director: Gillo Pontecorvo. Cast: Brahim Hadjadj, Jean Martin. Overview: The French Colonel...who was forced even to torture! One of the many women...who stopped at nothing to win! The Algerian Street Boy...who became a rebel hero! Genres: Drama, Foreign, War. Countries: Algeria, Italy. Runtime: 2h 1m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #212 Monsters, Inc. 2001 We Scare Because We Care. Directors: Lee Unkrich, David Silverman, Pete Docter. Cast: John Goodman, Billy Crystal, Mary Gibbs, Steve Buscemi, James Coburn, Jennifer Tilly, Bob Peterson, John Ratzenberger, Frank Oz, Steve Susskind, Bonnie Hunt, Jeff Pidgeon, Samuel Lord Black, Jack Angel, Bob Bergen. Overview: James Sullivan and Mike Wazowski are monsters, they earn their living scaring children and are the best in the business... even though they're more afraid of the children than they are of them. When a child accidentally enters their world, James and Mike suddenly find that kids are not to be afraid of and they uncover a conspiracy that could threaten all children across the world. Genres: Animation, Comedy, Fantasy, Family. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 32m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #213 Guardians of the Galaxy 2014 All heroes start somewhere. Director: James Gunn. Cast: Chris Pratt, Zoe Saldana, Dave Bautista, Bradley Cooper, Vin Diesel, Lee Pace, Michael Rooker, Karen Gillan, Djimon Hounsou, John C. Reilly, Glenn Close, Benicio del Toro, Josh Brolin, Ophelia Lovibond, Laura Haddock. Overview: A futuristic team of superheroes protect the galaxy from danger. A jet pilot gets stranded in space, and must unite a diverse team of aliens to form a squad capable of defeating cosmic threats. Genres: Adventure, Fantasy, Science Fiction. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 2m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #214 Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows: Part 2 2011 It all ends here Director: David Yates. Cast: Daniel Radcliffe, Rupert Grint, Emma Watson, Alan Rickman, Maggie Smith, Robbie Coltrane, Gemma Jones, Clémence Poésy, Emma Thompson, Warwick Davis, David Thewlis, Domhnall Gleeson, James Phelps, Oliver Phelps, Jim Broadbent. Overview: The end begins as Harry, Ron, and Hermione go back to Hogwarts to find and destroy Voldemorts final horcruxes, but when Voldemort finds out about their mission, the biggest battle begins and life as they know it will never be the same again. Genres: Action, Adventure, Family, Fantasy. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 15m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #215 Throne of Blood 1957 Kumonosu jô Director: Akira Kurosawa. Cast: Toshirô Mifune, Isuzu Yamada, Akira Kubo, Hiroshi Tachikawa, Takashi Shimura. Overview: Mikio and Washizu are the commanders of the 1st and 2nd Fortress under a local lord, who reigns in the Spiders' Web Castle. After defeating the lord's enemies in battle, they visit the fortress. Washizu, driven by his wife, conspires and murders the lord, becoming lord of the castle. But his evil deeds come back to haunt him. Genres: Eastern, Foreign, History. Country: Japan. Runtime: 1h 49m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #216 The Truman Show 1998 All the world's a stage... Director: Peter Weir. Cast: Jim Carrey, Laura Linney, Noah Emmerich, Natascha McElhone, Ed Harris, Holland Taylor, Brian Delate, Blair Slater, Heidi Schanz, Ron Taylor, Don Taylor, Ted Raymond, Judy Clayton, Peter Krause. Overview: Truman Burbank is the star of "The Truman Show," a 24-hour-a-day cultural TV phenomenon that broadcasts every aspect of his life -- live and in color -- without his knowledge. When Truman discovers by happenstance that his life is a sham for public consumption, he makes a desperate escape bid. Genres: Comedy, Drama. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 43m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #217 Fanny and Alexander 1983 Fanny och Alexander Director: Ingmar Bergman. Cast: Bertil Guve, Pernilla Allwin, Allan Edwall, Ewa Fröling, Jan Malmsjö, Gunn Wållgren, Jarl Kulle, Erland Josephson. Overview: A widowed actress and her children suffer hardships when she marries a conservative church leader. Genres: Drama, Foreign. Countries: Germany, France, Sweden. Runtime: 3h 8m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #218 Barry Lyndon 1975 Director: Stanley Kubrick. Cast: Ryan O'Neal, Marisa Berenson, Hardy Krüger, Diana Körner, Frank Middlemass, Arthur O'Sullivan, Godfrey Quigley, Patrick Magee, Steven Berkoff, Gay Hamilton, Marie Kean, Murray Melvin, André Morell, Leonard Rossiter, Leon Vitali. Overview: In the Eighteenth Century, in a small village in Ireland, Redmond Barry is a young farm boy in love with his cousin Nora Brady. When Nora engages to the British Captain John Quin, Barry challenges him for a duel of pistols. He wins and escapes to Dublin, but is robbed on the road. Without any other alternative, Barry joins the British Army to fight in the Seven Years War. Genres: Drama, Romance, War. Countries: United Kingdom, United States of America. Runtime: 3h 4m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #219 Rocky 1976 His whole life was a million-to-one shot. Director: John G. Avildsen. Cast: Sylvester Stallone, Talia Shire, Burt Young, Carl Weathers, Burgess Meredith, Thayer David, Joe Spinell, Jimmy Gambina, Bill Baldwin, Al Silvani, George Memmoli, Jodi Letizia, Diana Lewis, George O'Hanlon, Larry Carroll. Overview: A small time boxer gets a once in a lifetime chance to fight the heavyweight champ in a bout in which he strives to go the distance for his self-respect. Genres: Action, Adventure, Drama, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 59m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #220 Dog Day Afternoon 1975 Director: Sidney Lumet. Cast: Al Pacino, John Cazale, Charles Durning, Chris Sarandon, James Broderick, William Bogert, Penelope Allen, Sully Boyar, Beulah Garrick, Carol Kane, Sandra Kazan, Marcia Jean Kurtz, Amy Levitt, John Marriott, Estelle Omens. Overview: Dog Day Afternoon is a film based on true events and directed by Sidney Lumet. The film stars Al Pacino as a robber who held a bank hostage in Brooklyn, New York. Genres: Crime, Drama, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 4m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #221 The Imitation Game 2014 Director: Morten Tyldum. Cast: Benedict Cumberbatch, Keira Knightley, Mark Strong, Rory Kinnear, Charles Dance, Allen Leech, Matthew Beard, Matthew Goode, Tuppence Middleton, Steven Waddington, Hayley Joanne Bacon, Tom Goodman-Hill, Hannah Flynn, Matthew Beard, Ancuta Breaban. Overview: Based on the real life story of legendary cryptanalyst Alan Turing, the film portrays the nail-biting race against time by Turing and his brilliant team of code-breakers at Britain's top-secret Government Code and Cypher School at Bletchley Park, during the darkest days of World War II. Genres: Drama, History, Thriller, War. Country: United Kingdom. Runtime: 1h 53m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #222 Ip Man 2008 The celebrated Kung Fu master of Bruce Lee. Director: Wilson Yip. Cast: Donnie Yen, Simon Yam, Yu Xing, You-Nam Wong, Chen Zhi Hui. Overview: A semi-biographical account of Yip Man, the first martial arts master to teach the Chinese martial art of Wing Chun. The film focuses on events surrounding Ip that took place in the city of Foshan between the 1930s to 1940s during the Second Sino-Japanese War. Directed by Wilson Yip, the film stars Donnie Yen in the lead role, and features fight choreography by Sammo Hung. Genres: Action, Foreign, History. Country: Hong Kong. Runtime: 1h 45m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #223 The King's Speech 2010 God save the king. Director: Tom Hooper. Cast: Colin Firth, Geoffrey Rush, Helena Bonham Carter, Guy Pearce, Claire Bloom, Michael Gambon, Timothy Spall, Derek Jacobi, Jennifer Ehle, Ramona Marquez, Freya Wilson. Overview: Tells the story of the man who became King George VI, the father of Queen Elizabeth II. After his brother abdicates, George ('Bertie') reluctantly assumes the throne. Plagued by a dreaded stutter and considered unfit to be king, Bertie engages the help of an unorthodox speech therapist named Lionel Logue. Through a set of unexpected techniques, and as a result of an unlikely friendship, Bertie is able to find his voice and boldly lead the country into war. Genres: Drama, Foreign, History. Country: United Kingdom. Runtime: 1h 59m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #224 High Noon 1952 The story of a man who was too proud to run Director: Fred Zinnemann. Cast: Gary Cooper, Grace Kelly, Thomas Mitchell, Lloyd Bridges, Katy Jurado, Otto Kruger, Lon Chaney Jr., Harry Morgan, Ian MacDonald, Eve McVeagh, Morgan Farley, Harry Shannon, Lee Van Cleef, Robert J. Wilke, Sheb Wooley. Overview: High Noon is about a recently freed leader of a gang of bandits in the desert who is looking to get revenge on the Sheriff who put him in jail. A legendary western film from the Austrian director Fred Zinnemann. Genres: Action, Drama, Western. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 25m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #225 La Haine 1995 Director: Mathieu Kassovitz. Cast: Vincent Cassel, Hubert Koundé, Saïd Taghmaoui, Abdel Ahmed Ghili, Solo, Joseph Momo, Héloïse Rauth, François Levantal, Edouard Montoute, Benoît Magimel, Vincent Lindon, Christophe Rossignon, Mathieu Kassovitz, Marc Duret, Philippe Nahon. Overview: Abdel, a local hoodlum, is hospitalized after a riot, where a policeman lost his gun. His friend Vinz finds it and claims he will kill a cop if Abdel dies. Genres: Drama, Foreign. Country: France. Runtime: 1h 35m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #226 A Fistful of Dollars 1964 Per un pugno di dollari Director: Sergio Leone. Cast: Clint Eastwood, Marianne Koch, Wolfgang Lukschy, José Calvo, Gian Maria Volonté, Sieghardt Rupp, Antonio Prieto, Margarita Lozano, Daniel Martín, Bruno Carotenuto, Benito Stefanelli, Mario Brega, Joseph Egger. Overview: A Fistful of Dollars is the 1964 Sergio Leone film starring Clint Eastwood and the first Spaghetti Western to take place in the United States. The film was the first in a trilogy that referenced Akira Kurosawa’s ‘Yojimbo’ and became an international success and founded the Spaghetti Western genre. Genres: Action, Western. Countries: Italy, Spain, Germany. Runtime: 1h 39m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #227 Pirates of the Caribbean: The Curse of the Black Pearl 2003 Prepare to be blown out of the water. Director: Gore Verbinski. Cast: Johnny Depp, Orlando Bloom, Keira Knightley, Geoffrey Rush, Lee Arenberg, Jonathan Pryce, Jack Davenport, Mackenzie Crook, Damian O'Hare, Giles New, Angus Barnett, David Bailie, Michael Berry Jr., Isaac C. Singleton Jr., Zoe Saldana. Overview: Jack Sparrow, a freewheeling 17th-century pirate who roams the Caribbean Sea butts heads with a rival pirate bent on pillaging the village of Port Royal. When the governor's daughter is kidnapped, Sparrow decides to help the girl's love save her. But their seafaring mission is hardly simple. Genres: Action, Adventure, Comedy, Fantasy. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 23m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #228 Notorious 1946 Notorious woman of affairs... Adventurous man of the world Director: Alfred Hitchcock. Cast: Cary Grant, Ingrid Bergman, Claude Rains, Louis Calhern, Leopoldine Konstantin, Reinhold Schünzel, Ivan Triesault, Alex Minotis, Eberhard Krumschmidt, Fred Nurney, Moroni Olsen, Wally Brown, Charles Mendl, Ricardo Costa. Overview: Released shortly after the war, this classic Hitchcock film illustrates the battle between German Nazis and American spies in Rio de Janeiro where a German businessman keeps a wine cellar with uranium ore. Genres: Drama, Suspense, Romance, Film Noir. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 42m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #229 Castle in the Sky 1986 Tenkû no shiro Rapyuta Director: Hayao Miyazaki. Cast: Keiko Yokozawa, Mayumi Tanaka, Minori Terada, Kotoe Hatsui, Fujio Tokita, Ichirô Nagai, Hiroshi Itoh, Machiko Washio, Takumi Kamiyama, Yoshito Yasuhara, Sukekiyo Kameyama, Eken Mine, Tarako, Reiko Suzuki, Masashi Sugawara. Overview: The orphan Sheeta inherited a mysterious crystal that links her to the mythical sky-kingdom of Laputa. With the help of resourceful Pazu and a rollicking band of sky pirates, she makes her way to the ruins of the once-great civilization. Sheeta and Pazu must outwit the evil Muska, who plans to use Laputa's science to make himself ruler of the world. Genres: Animation, Family, Fantasy, Science Fiction. Country: Japan. Runtime: 2h 4m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #230 Prisoners 2013 Every moment matters Director: Denis Villeneuve. Cast: Jake Gyllenhaal, Hugh Jackman, Paul Dano, Maria Bello, Melissa Leo, Viola Davis, Terrence Howard, Dylan Minnette, Zoe Borde, Wayne Duvall, David Dastmalchian, Len Cariou, Sandra Ellis Lafferty. Overview: A Boston man kidnaps the person he suspects is behind the disappearance of his young daughter and her best friend. Genres: Crime, Drama, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 26m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #231 The Help 2011 Change begins with a whisper. Director: Tate Taylor. Cast: Emma Stone, Bryce Dallas Howard, Mike Vogel, Sissy Spacek, Viola Davis, Octavia Spencer, Cicely Tyson, Aunjanue Ellis. Overview: Aibileen Clark (Viola Davis) is a middle-aged African-American maid who has spent her life raising white children and has recently lost her only son; Minny Jackson (Octavia Spencer) is an African-American maid who has often offended her employers despite her family's struggles with money and her desperate need for jobs; and Eugenia "Skeeter" Phelan (Emma Stone) is a young white woman who has recently moved back home after graduating college to find out her childhood maid has mysteriously disappeared. These three stories intertwine to explain how life in Jackson, Mississippi revolves around "the help"; yet they are always kept at a certain distance because of racial lines. Genre: Drama. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 26m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #232 Roman Holiday 1953 Romance in romantic Rome! Director: William Wyler. Cast: Gregory Peck, Audrey Hepburn, Eddie Albert, Hartley Power, Harcourt Williams, Margaret Rawlings, Tullio Carminati, Paolo Carlini, Claudio Ermelli, Paola Borboni, Alfredo Rizzo. Overview: Cosseted European princess who goes AWOL in Rome and is soon taken under the wing of tabloid journalist Joe Peck and his photographer sidekick, Irving Radovich. She thinks the boys don't suspect who she really is, but they're onto her -- and sense a sensational story if they can just keep Princess Ann handlers from retrieving her too soon. Genres: Comedy, Drama, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 58m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #233 Who's Afraid of Virginia Woolf? 1966 You are cordially invited to George and Martha's for an evening of fun and games Directors: Bud Grace, Michael Daves, Mike Nichols. Cast: Elizabeth Taylor, Richard Burton, George Segal, Sandy Dennis. Overview: Mike Nichols’ film from Edward Albees play brought new themes to the film industry. Elizabeth Taylor and Richard Burton have never been more brilliant together as they portray an experienced married couple who love each other yet verbally attack one another when they see how boring their naïve newlywed guests have made their night. Genres: Comedy, Drama. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 11m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #234 Spring, Summer, Fall, Winter... and Spring 2003 Bom yeoreum gaeul gyeoul geurigo bom Director: Kim Ki-Duk. Cast: Oh Young, Kim Ki-Duk, Kim Young-min, Seo Jae-kyung, Ha Yeo-jin, Kim Jong-ho, Kim Jung-young, Dae-han Ji, Choi Min, Park Ji-a, Song Min-young. Overview: This South Korean film depicts the life of the ever overwhelming course of nature in the changing seasons. Genres: Drama, Foreign. Countries: Germany, Korea. Runtime: 1h 43m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #235 The Night of the Hunter 1955 The wedding night, the anticipation, the kiss, the knife, BUT ABOVE ALL...THE SUSPENSE! Director: Charles Laughton. Cast: Robert Mitchum, Shelley Winters, Lillian Gish, James Gleason, Evelyn Varden, Peter Graves, Don Beddoe, Billy Chapin, Sally Jane Bruce, Gloria Castillo. Overview: A religious fanatic marries a gullible widow whose young children are reluctant to tell him where their real daddy hid $10,000 he'd stolen in a robbery. Genres: Drama, Suspense, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 33m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #236 Beauty and the Beast 1991 The most beautiful love story ever told. Directors: Gary Trousdale, Kirk Wise. Cast: Paige O'Hara, Robby Benson, Richard White, Jerry Orbach, David Ogden Stiers, Angela Lansbury. Overview: Follow the adventures of Belle, a bright young woman who finds herself in the castle of a prince who's been turned into a mysterious beast. With the help of the castle's enchanted staff, Belle soon learns the most important lesson of all -- that true beauty comes from within. Genres: Animation, Fantasy, Family. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 24m. Rated: G. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #237 Papillon 1973 Director: Franklin J. Schaffner. Cast: Steve McQueen, Dustin Hoffman, Woodrow Parfrey, Robert Deman, Anthony Zerbe, Victor Jory, Don Gordon, Bill Mumy. Overview: A man befriends a fellow criminal as the two of them begin serving their sentence on a dreadful prison island, which inspires the man to plot his escape. Genres: Action, Crime, Drama, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 25m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #238 La Strada 1954 Director: Federico Fellini. Cast: Anthony Quinn, Giulietta Masina, Richard Basehart, Aldo Silvani, Marcella Rovere, Livia Venturini, Gustavo Giorgi, Yami Kamadeva, Mario Passante, Anna Primula. Overview: With this poetically fabulous film classic Italian director Federico Fellini makes a world wide success of emotional melodrama and a highlight of the Italian Neo-realism movement. Genres: Drama, Road Movie. Country: Italy. Runtime: 1h 44m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #239 Anatomy of a Murder 1959 Director: Otto Preminger. Cast: James Stewart, Lee Remick, Ben Gazzara, Arthur O'Connell, Duke Ellington, Eve Arden, Kathryn Grant, George C. Scott, Orson Bean, Russ Brown. Overview: Paul Biegler is a small town lawyer who until recently had been the local prosecutor and given a lack of clients, he spends a lot of time fishing. When a murder takes place in a trailer park on the outskirts of town, he is asked to defend Lt. Frederick Manion who admits to having killed Barney Quill, a local bar owner who allegedly raped his wife. He now claims temporary insanity. The case is both Genres: Crime, Drama, Mystery, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 40m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #240 X-Men: Days of Future Past 2014 To save the future, they must alter the past Director: Bryan Singer. Cast: Patrick Stewart, James McAvoy, Michael Fassbender, Ian McKellen, Jennifer Lawrence, Nicholas Hoult, Hugh Jackman, Ellen Page, Shawn Ashmore, Peter Dinklage, Halle Berry, Booboo Stewart, Fan Bingbing, Daniel Cudmore, Adan Canto. Overview: The ultimate X-Men ensemble fights a war for the survival of the species across two time periods in X-MEN: DAYS OF FUTURE PAST. The beloved characters from the original “X-Men” film trilogy join forces with their younger selves from “X-Men: First Class,” in an epic battle that must change the past – to save our future. Genres: Action, Adventure, Fantasy, Science Fiction. Country: Canada. Runtime: 2h 11m. Rated: PG-13. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #241 Before Sunset 2004 What if you had a second chance with the one that got away? Director: Richard Linklater. Cast: Ethan Hawke, Julie Delpy, Vernon Dobtcheff, Louise Lemoine Torrès, Rodolphe Pauly, Mariane Plasteig, Diabolo, Denis Evrard, Albert Delpy, Marie Pillet. Overview: Nine years ago two strangers met by chance and spent a night in Vienna that ended before sunrise. They are about to meet for the first time since. Now they have one afternoon to find out if they belong together. Genres: Drama, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 17m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #242 The Hustler 1961 They called him Fast Eddie. He was a winner. He was a loser. He was a hustler. Director: Robert Rossen. Cast: Paul Newman, Jackie Gleason, Piper Laurie, George C. Scott, Myron McCormick, Murray Hamilton, Michael Constantine, Gordon B. Clarke. Overview: Fast Eddie Felson is a small-time pool hustler with a lot of talent but a self-destructive attitude. His bravado causes him to challenge the legendary Minnesota Fats to a high-stakes match, but he loses in a heartbreaking marathon. Now broke and without his long-time manager, Felson faces an uphill battle to regain his confidence and his game. It isn't until he hits rock bottom that he agrees to join up with ruthless and cutthroat manager Bert Gordon. Gordon agrees to take him on the road to learn the ropes. But Felson soon realizes that making it to the top could cost him his soul, and perhaps his girlfriend. Will he decide that this is too steep a price to pay in time to save himself? Genres: Drama, Sport. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 14m. Rated: NR. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #243 The Graduate 1967 This is Benjamin. He's a little worried about his future. Director: Mike Nichols. Cast: Anne Bancroft, Dustin Hoffman, Katharine Ross, Murray Hamilton, Buck Henry, Brian Avery, Walter Brooke, William Daniels. Overview: Recent college graduate Benjamin Braddock is trapped into an affair with Mrs. Robinson, who happens to be the wife of his father's business partner and then finds himself falling in love with her teenage daughter, Elaine. Genres: Comedy, Drama, Romance. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 45m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #244 Elite Squad: The Enemy Within 2011 Director: José Padilha. Cast: Wagner Moura, Irandhir Santos, André Ramiro, Pedro Van-Held, Maria Ribeiro, Sandro Rocha, Milhem Cortaz, Tainá Müller, Seu Jorge, André Mattos. Overview: After a bloody invasion of the BOPE in the High-Security Penitentiary Bangu 1 in Rio de Janeiro to control a rebellion of interns, the Lieutenant-Colonel Roberto Nascimento and the second in command Captain André Matias are accused by the Human Right Aids member Diogo Fraga of execution of prisoners. Matias is transferred to the corrupted Military Police and Nascimento is exonerated from the BOPE by the Governor. Genres: Action, Crime, Drama, Foreign, Thriller. Country: Brazil. Runtime: 1h 55m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #245 The Big Sleep 1946 The picture they were born for! Director: Howard Hawks. Cast: Humphrey Bogart, John Ridgely, Martha Vickers, Dorothy Malone, Lauren Bacall, Peggy Knudsen, Charles Waldron, Regis Toomey, Charles D. Brown, Elisha Cook Jr., Louis Jean Heydt. Overview: Private Detective Philip Marlowe is hired by a rich family. Before the complex case is over, he's seen murder, blackmail, and what might be love. Genres: Crime, Drama, Mystery, Suspense, Thriller. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 1h 56m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #246 Gangs of Wasseypur 2012 A son seeks vengeance when he is father is killed by a coal mine owner. Director: Anurag Kashyap. Cast: Manoj Bajpai, Tigmanshu Dhulia, Nawazuddin Siddiqui, Richa Chadda. Overview: Shahid Khan is exiled after impersonating the legendary Sultana Daku in order to rob British trains. Now outcast, Shahid becomes a worker at Ramadhir Singh's colliery, only to spur a revenge battle that passes on to generations. At the turn of the decade, Shahid's son, the philandering Sardar Khan vows to get his father's honor back, becoming the most feared man of Wasseypur. Genres: Action, Thriller, Crime, Foreign. Country: India. Runtime: 2h 40m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #247 Akira 1988 Neo-Tokyo is about to E.X.P.L.O.D.E. Director: Katsuhiro Ôtomo. Cast: Mitsuo Iwata, Nozomu Sasaki, Mami Koyama, Tesshô Genda, Hiroshi Ôtake, Kôichi Kitamura, Yuriko Fuchizaki, Masaaki Ôkura, Takeshi Kusao, Kazuhiro Kamifuji, Tatsuhiko Nakamura, Fukue Itô. Overview: Childhood friends Tetsuo and Kaneda are pulled into the post-apocalyptic underworld of Neo-Tokyo and forced to fight for their very survival. Kaneda is a bike gang leader, and Tetsuo is a member of a tough motorcycle crew who becomes involved in a covert government project called Akira. But a bloody battle ensues when Kaneda sets out to save his friend. Genres: Animation, Science Fiction, Action. Country: Japan. Runtime: 2h 4m. Rated: R. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #248 Underground 1995 Director: Emir Kusturica. Cast: Predrag Lakovic, Lazar Ristovski, Mirjana Jokovic, Slavko Štimac. Overview: The story starts with the underground manufacturing of weapons of Belgrado, during WWII, and evolves into surreal situations. The smuggler of the weapons forgets to mention to the workers that the war is over. 50 years later, they become suspicious, and break out of their underground "shelter" --- only to convince themselves that the guy was right: the war is still going on. Genres: Comedy, Drama, Foreign. Countries: Germany, France, Hungary. Runtime: 2h 50m. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #249 A Streetcar Named Desire 1951 ...Blanche, who wanted so much to stay a lady... Director: Elia Kazan. Cast: Vivien Leigh, Marlon Brando, Kim Hunter, Karl Malden, Rudy Bond, Nick Dennis, Peg Hillias, Wright King, Richard Garrick, Ann Dere, Edna Thomas, Mickey Kuhn, Mel Archer, Marietta Canty, John George. Overview: A Streetcar Named Desire is the film adaptation from the play by Tennessee Williams and directed by Elia Kazan. The film tells the drama story of the conflict between run down southern states and the exemplary industrial states in the north. Disturbed Blanche DuBois moves in with her sister in New Orleans and is tormented by her brutish brother-in-law while her reality crumbles around her. Genre: Drama. Country: United States of America. Runtime: 2h 5m. Rated: PG. Mark this movie as seen or wanted #250 Three Colors: Red 1994 Trois couleurs: Rouge Director: Krzysztof Kieślowski. Cast: Irène Jacob, Jean-Louis Trintignant, Jean-Pierre Lorit, Frédérique Feder, Samuel Le Bihan, Marion Stalens, Juliette Binoche, Julie Delpy, Zbigniew Zamachowski. Overview: Red This is the third film from the trilogy by Kieślowski. “Red” meaning brotherliness. Here Kieślowski masterly tells strange coincidentally linked stories in the most packed work. Genres: Drama, Mystery, Romance, Foreign. Countries: France, Poland, Switzerland. Runtime: 1h 39m. Rated: R. Load more movies Load all movies Continue with the following popular movie lists: Oscar winners Best movies of 2015 2010-2016 movies Action movies New movies in theaters Copyright 2010 - 2016 Good Movies List I've seen this movie I want to see this movie I don't want to see this movie Clear this movie mark
